4274 | damage (noun): a change for the worse, harm done | loc: kár
  EN TS: Just a "little" damage.
  hu TS: Csak egy „pici” kár.
  EN FS: Just a "little" snow.
  hu FS: Csak egy „pici” hó.
  EN TP: damage to a parked car
  hu TP: kár egy parkoló autón
  EN FP: damage to a bicycle
  hu FP: kár egy biciklin
4275 | complain (verb): to express displeasure or unhappiness | loc: panaszkodni
  EN TS: She is complaining about the car.
  hu TS: Az autó miatt panaszkodik.
  EN FS: She is complaining about the bike.
  hu FS: A bicikli miatt panaszkodik.
  EN TP: to complain about a crash
  hu TP: panaszkodni egy baleset miatt
  EN FP: to complain about the food
  hu FP: panaszkodni az étel miatt
4276 | elderly (adjective): advanced in years, old | loc: idős
  EN TS: An elderly lady is going home.
  hu TS: Egy idős hölgy hazafelé tart.
  EN FS: An elderly man is going home.
  hu FS: Egy idős úr hazafelé tart.
  EN TP: an elderly woman walking
  hu TP: egy sétáló idős nő
  EN FP: an elderly woman dancing
  hu FP: egy táncoló idős nő
4277 | accountant (noun): someone who keeps and checks business accounts | loc: könyvelő
  EN TS: The accountant found it!
  hu TS: A könyvelő megtalálta!
  EN FS: The accountant lost it!
  hu FS: A könyvelő elvesztette!
  EN TP: an accountant with receipts
  hu TP: könyvelő nyugtákkal
  EN FP: an accountant on holiday
  hu FP: könyvelő szabadságon
4279 | theatre (noun): a building where plays or films are shown | loc: színház
  EN TS: Nobody came to the theatre!
  hu TS: Senki sem jött el a színházba!
  EN FS: Nobody came to the stadium!
  hu FS: Senki sem jött el a stadionba!
  EN TP: a theatre stage
  hu TP: színházi színpad
  EN FP: a theatre ticket
  hu FP: színházjegy
4280 | filming (noun): the act of making a film | loc: forgatás
  EN TS: Filming day: she is in tears.
  hu TS: Forgatás napja: könnyekben úszik.
  EN FS: Filming day: she is laughing.
  hu FS: Forgatás napja: nevetgél.
  EN TP: filming a sad scene
  hu TP: egy szomorú jelenet forgatása
  EN FP: filming a cooking show
  hu FP: egy főzőműsor forgatása
4281 | change (noun): when something passes from one state to another | loc: változás
  EN TS: The colour change is amazing.
  hu TS: Elképesztő ez a színváltozás.
  EN FS: The size change is amazing.
  hu FS: Elképesztő ez a méretváltozás.
  EN TP: a change of colour
  hu TP: a szín változása
  EN FP: a change of clothes
  hu FP: ruhacsere
4282 | shelter (noun): a place that cares for animals with no home | loc: menhely
  EN TS: They got a dog from a shelter.
  hu TS: Menhelyről hoztak egy kutyát.
  EN FS: They got a cat from a shelter.
  hu FS: Menhelyről hoztak egy macskát.
  EN TP: a dog from a shelter
  hu TP: kutya a menhelyről
  EN FP: a shelter from the rain
  hu FP: menedék az eső elől
4283 | cooking (noun): preparing food with heat | loc: főzés
  EN TS: Her cooking gets applause!
  hu TS: A főzését megtapsolják!
  EN FS: Her singing gets applause!
  hu FS: Az éneklését megtapsolják!
  EN TP: a cooking class
  hu TP: egy főzési óra
  EN FP: a cooking contest
  hu FP: egy főzőverseny
4284 | rush (noun): the act of moving hurriedly and carelessly | loc: rohanás
  EN TS: He is leaving in a rush!
  hu TS: Nagy rohanásban távozik!
  EN FS: He is leaving in a car!
  hu FS: Nagy autóval távozik!
  EN TP: a morning rush
  hu TP: reggeli rohanás
  EN FP: a rush hour
  hu FP: csúcsforgalom
4285 | adult (noun): a fully grown person | loc: felnőtt
  EN TS: Adult life means bills.
  hu TS: A felnőtt élet: számlák.
  EN FS: Adult life means games.
  hu FS: A felnőtt élet: játék.
  EN TP: an adult going to work
  hu TP: munkába induló felnőtt
  EN FP: an adult going to bed
  hu FP: aludni induló felnőtt
4286 | fan (verb): to move the air with something, like a fan | loc: legyezni
  EN TS: She is fanning herself.
  hu TS: Legyezi magát.
  EN FS: She is fanning the cat.
  hu FS: Legyezi a macskát.
  EN TP: fanning herself in the heat
  hu TP: legyezi magát a hőségben
  EN FP: fanning a barbecue fire
  hu FP: grilltüzet legyez
4287 | view (verb): to look at something carefully | loc: megtekinteni
  EN TS: They are viewing the flat.
  hu TS: Megtekintik a lakást.
  EN FS: They are viewing the car.
  hu FS: Megtekintik az autót.
  EN TP: viewing an empty flat
  hu TP: üres lakás megtekintése
  EN FP: viewing a used car
  hu FP: használt autó megtekintése
4288 | target (noun): a point or object to shoot at | loc: céltábla
  EN TS: She is focusing on the target.
  hu TS: A céltáblára koncentrál.
  EN FS: She is focusing on the camera.
  hu FS: A kamerára koncentrál.
  EN TP: three round targets
  hu TP: három kerek céltábla
  EN FP: a target on a wall
  hu FP: céltábla a falon
4289 | cold (noun): the absence of heat | loc: hideg
  EN TS: The cold is blowing her back!
  hu TS: A hideg szinte hátrasodorja!
  EN FS: The heat is blowing her back!
  hu FS: A hőség szinte hátrasodorja!
  EN TP: a blast of cold
  hu TP: hideg légáramlat
  EN FP: a cold drink
  hu FP: egy hideg ital
4290 | cool (verb): to make something cool or cooler | loc: hűteni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Cold air is cooling him down.
  hu TS: A hideg levegő lehűti.
  EN FS: Cold beer is cooling him down.
  hu FS: A hideg sör lehűti.
  EN TP: cooling down under the vent
  hu TP: hűti magát a szellőző alatt
  EN FP: cooling a drink with ice
  hu FP: italt hűt jéggel
4291 | forehead (noun): the part of the face above the eyes | loc: homlok
  EN TS: He is cooling his forehead. So hot!
  hu TS: Hűti a homlokát. De meleg van!
  EN FS: He is cooling his feet. So hot!
  hu FS: Hűti a lábát. De meleg van!
  EN TP: a glass on his forehead
  hu TP: pohár a homlokán
  EN FP: a kiss on the forehead
  hu FP: puszi a homlokra
4292 | breeze (noun): a slight, refreshing wind | loc: szellő
  EN TS: A breeze is moving her hair.
  hu TS: Szellő fújja a haját.
  EN FS: A fan is moving her hair.
  hu FS: Ventilátor fújja a haját.
  EN TP: a breeze in the meadow
  hu TP: szellő a réten
  EN FP: a breeze by the sea
  hu FP: szellő a tengerparton
4293 | jet (noun): an airplane powered by jet engines | loc: sugárhajtású repülőgép
  EN TS: The jet is taking off!
  hu TS: A sugárhajtású repülőgép felszáll!
  EN FS: The jet is landing!
  hu FS: A sugárhajtású repülőgép leszáll!
  EN TP: a jet taking off
  hu TP: felszálló sugárhajtású repülőgép
  EN FP: a jet of water
  hu FP: vízsugár
4294 | low (adverb): in a low position, near the ground | loc: alacsonyan
  EN TS: The plane is flying very low!
  hu TS: A gép nagyon alacsonyan repül!
  EN FS: The kite is flying very low!
  hu FS: A sárkány nagyon alacsonyan repül!
  EN TP: flying low over him
  hu TP: alacsonyan repül fölötte
  EN FP: flying low over the sea
  hu FP: alacsonyan repül a tenger fölött
4295 | photograph (verb): to take a picture on film or a camera | loc: fényképezni
  EN TS: Look, he's photographing a plane!
  hu TS: Nézd, egy repülőt fényképez!
  EN FS: Look, he's photographing a camel!
  hu FS: Nézd, egy tevét fényképez!
  EN TP: photographing a landing jet
  hu TP: leszálló gép fényképezése
  EN FP: photographing the desert sand
  hu FP: a sivatagi homok fényképezése
4296 | signal (noun): a gesture or action that sends a message | loc: jel
  EN TS: Raised wands send a signal.
  hu TS: A felemelt pálcák jelet adnak.
  EN FS: Raised flags send a signal.
  hu FS: A felemelt zászlók jelet adnak.
  EN TP: a signal to the pilot
  hu TP: jel a pilótának
  EN FP: a weak phone signal
  hu FP: gyenge telefonjel
4297 | departure (noun): the act of leaving, departing | loc: indulás
  EN TS: The departures board is huge!
  hu TS: Óriási az indulási tábla!
  EN FS: The arrivals board is huge!
  hu FS: Óriási az érkezési tábla!
  EN TP: a huge departures board
  hu TP: óriási indulási tábla
  EN FP: a departure by train
  hu FP: indulás vonattal
4298 | straight (adverb): in a direct line, without deviation | loc: egyenesen
  EN TS: Boys are lining up straight.
  hu TS: A fiúk egyenesen sorakoznak fel.
  EN FS: Girls are lining up straight.
  hu FS: A lányok egyenesen sorakoznak fel.
  EN TP: lining up straight
  hu TP: egyenesen felsorakozni
  EN FP: going straight home
  hu FP: egyenesen haza
4299 | react (verb): to show a response to something | loc: reagálni
  EN TS: He reacts to cats. Poor guy.
  hu TS: Reagál a macskákra. Szegény srác.
  EN FS: He reacts to dogs. Poor guy.
  hu FS: Reagál a kutyákra. Szegény srác.
  EN TP: reacting to a cat
  hu TP: reagál egy macskára
  EN FP: reacting to bad news
  hu FP: reagál a rossz hírre
4300 | rubbish (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: szemét
  EN TS: Rubbish everywhere!
  hu TS: Mindenhol szemét!
  EN FS: Flowers everywhere!
  hu FS: Mindenhol virág!
  EN TP: bins heaped with rubbish
  hu TP: szeméttel teli kukák
  EN FP: rubbish on a beach
  hu FP: szemét a strandon
4301 | gap (noun): an empty space between things | loc: rés
  EN TS: He is squeezing through a gap.
  hu TS: Átpréseli magát egy résen.
  EN FS: He is crawling through a gap.
  hu FS: Átmászik egy résen.
  EN TP: squeezing through a narrow gap
  hu TP: átpréselődik egy szűk résen
  EN FP: a gap in the fence
  hu FP: rés a kerítésen
4302 | emergency (noun): a sudden crisis that needs immediate action | loc: vészhelyzet
  EN TS: An emergency in the rain.
  hu TS: Vészhelyzet az esőben.
  EN FS: An emergency in the snow.
  hu FS: Vészhelyzet a hóban.
  EN TP: an emergency at night
  hu TP: vészhelyzet éjjel
  EN FP: an emergency exit door
  hu FP: vészkijárati ajtó
4303 | medical (adjective): relating to medicine and doctors | loc: orvosi
  EN TS: A medical team is crossing.
  hu TS: Egy orvosi csapat kel át.
  EN FS: A police team is crossing.
  hu FS: Egy rendőri csapat kel át.
  EN TP: a medical team crossing
  hu TP: átkelő orvosi csapat
  EN FP: a medical exam at school
  hu FP: orvosi vizsgálat az iskolában
4304 | football (noun): the oval ball used in American football | loc: amerikaifutball-labda
  EN TS: He threw the football, nice.
  hu TS: Eldobta az amerikaifutball-labdát, szép!
  EN FS: He kicked the football, nice.
  hu FS: Elrúgta az amerikaifutball-labdát, szép!
  EN TP: an oval football mid-air
  hu TP: repülő amerikaifutball-labda
  EN FP: a round football on grass
  hu FP: kerek focilabda a füvön
4305 | boy (noun): a young male person | loc: fiú
  EN TS: The boy got a huge burger.
  hu TS: A fiú óriási burgert kapott.
  EN FS: The boy got a huge pizza.
  hu FS: A fiú óriási pizzát kapott.
  EN TP: a boy getting a burger
  hu TP: burgert kapó fiú
  EN FP: a boy cooking a burger
  hu FP: burgert sütő fiú
4306 | prison (noun): a place where persons are locked up for punishment | loc: börtön
  EN TS: They are leaving prison!
  hu TS: Kijönnek a börtönből!
  EN FS: They are entering prison!
  hu FS: Bemennek a börtönbe!
  EN TP: leaving the prison
  hu TP: kilépés a börtönből
  EN FP: visiting a prison
  hu FP: börtönlátogatás
4307 | banner (noun): a long strip of cloth or paper with a message | loc: transzparens
  EN TS: Four banners are waving above.
  hu TS: Négy transzparens lobog fent.
  EN FS: Two banners are waving above.
  hu FS: Két transzparens lobog fent.
  EN TP: banners above the stand
  hu TP: transzparensek a lelátó fölött
  EN FP: banners above the shop
  hu FP: transzparensek a bolt fölött
4308 | supporter (noun): a person who backs a team or politician | loc: szurkoló
  EN TS: These supporters never stop singing.
  hu TS: Ezek a szurkolók sosem hagyják abba az éneklést.
  EN FS: These supporters never stop dancing.
  hu FS: Ezek a szurkolók sosem hagyják abba a táncot.
  EN TP: singing supporters
  hu TP: éneklő szurkolók
  EN FP: sleeping supporters
  hu FP: alvó szurkolók
4309 | anthem (noun): a song of loyalty to a nation or school | loc: himnusz
  EN TS: The anthem is making her cry.
  hu TS: A himnusz megríkatja.
  EN FS: The goal is making her cry.
  hu FS: A gól megríkatja.
  EN TP: singing the anthem
  hu TP: himnuszt énekelni
  EN FP: writing the anthem
  hu FP: himnuszt írni
4310 | emotional (adjective): showing strong feelings openly | loc: érzelmes
  EN TS: The emotional player is crying!
  hu TS: Az érzelmes játékos sír!
  EN FS: The emotional player is laughing!
  hu FS: Az érzelmes játékos nevet!
  EN TP: an emotional team song
  hu TP: érzelmes csapatdal
  EN FP: an emotional wedding song
  hu FP: érzelmes esküvői dal
4311 | young (adjective): in an early period of life | loc: fiatal
  EN TS: Even grandma plays with the young man.
  hu TS: Még a nagyi is a fiatal sráccal játszik.
  EN FS: Even grandpa plays with the young man.
  hu FS: Még a nagypapa is a fiatal sráccal játszik.
  EN TP: a young basketball player
  hu TP: fiatal kosárlabdázó
  EN FP: a young tennis player
  hu FP: fiatal teniszező
4312 | loud (adjective): producing sound of great volume | loc: hangos
  EN TS: He is loud, but nobody hears.
  hu TS: Hangos, de senki sem hallja.
  EN FS: He is quiet, but nobody hears.
  hu FS: Csendes, de senki sem hallja.
  EN TP: a loud call
  hu TP: hangos kiáltás
  EN FP: a loud party
  hu FP: hangos buli
4313 | pub (noun): a building with a bar where people drink | loc: kocsma
  EN TS: The whole pub is singing!
  hu TS: Az egész kocsma énekel!
  EN FS: The whole pub is sleeping!
  hu FS: Az egész kocsma alszik!
  EN TP: karaoke in a pub
  hu TP: karaoke a kocsmában
  EN FP: a pub quiz night
  hu FP: kocsmakvíz est
4314 | orange (noun): a round orange citrus fruit | loc: narancs
  EN TS: Four oranges are in the bowl.
  hu TS: Négy narancs van a tálban.
  EN FS: Four apples are in the bowl.
  hu FS: Négy alma van a tálban.
  EN TP: a bowl of oranges
  hu TP: egy tál narancs
  EN FP: a glass of orange juice
  hu FP: egy pohár narancslé
4315 | price (noun): the amount of money something is sold for | loc: ár
  EN TS: The price keeps going up!
  hu TS: Az ár egyre csak nő!
  EN FS: The price keeps going down!
  hu FS: Az ár egyre csak csökken!
  EN TP: the price of a flat
  hu TP: egy lakás ára
  EN FP: the price of a car
  hu FP: egy autó ára
4316 | sorry (adjective): feeling regret over something you did | loc: bűnbánó
  EN TS: He is sorry. Tulips will help.
  hu TS: Bűnbánó képet vág. A tulipán majd segít.
  EN FS: He is sorry. Roses will help.
  hu FS: Bűnbánó képet vág. A rózsa majd segít.
  EN TP: sorry about the coffee
  hu TP: bűnbánó a kávé miatt
  EN FP: sorry about the cake
  hu FP: bűnbánó a torta miatt
4317 | apologize (verb): to admit your faults and say sorry | loc: bocsánatot kérni
  EN TS: He is apologizing with coffee.
  hu TS: Kávéval kér bocsánatot.
  EN FS: He is apologizing with cake.
  hu FS: Tortával kér bocsánatot.
  EN TP: apologizing for a spill
  hu TP: bocsánatot kér a kilöttyintésért
  EN FP: apologizing for being late
  hu FP: bocsánatot kér a késésért
4318 | applause (noun): showing approval by clapping the hands | loc: taps
  EN TS: His applause is growing.
  hu TS: Egyre nagyobb a tapsa.
  EN FS: His laughter is growing.
  hu FS: Egyre nagyobb a nevetése.
  EN TP: applause for the performer
  hu TP: taps az előadónak
  EN FP: applause for the team
  hu FP: taps a csapatnak
4319 | blend (verb): to combine things into one | loc: összekeverni
  EN TS: The stripes are blending in.
  hu TS: A csíkok összekeverednek.
  EN FS: The stripes are growing wider.
  hu FS: A csíkok egyre szélesebbek.
  EN TP: blending cream into skin
  hu TP: krém bedolgozása a bőrbe
  EN FP: blending fruit in a mixer
  hu FP: gyümölcs turmixolása
4320 | plan (noun): a scale drawing of a building | loc: tervrajz
  EN TS: He is drawing a plan.
  hu TS: Tervrajzot rajzol.
  EN FS: He is drawing a face.
  hu FS: Arcot rajzol.
  EN TP: drawing a house plan
  hu TP: egy ház tervrajza
  EN FP: making a holiday plan
  hu FP: nyaralási terv
4321 | model (noun): a representation of something, often smaller | loc: makett
  EN TS: She is fixing a city model.
  hu TS: Egy városmakettet javít.
  EN FS: She is fixing a car model.
  hu FS: Egy autómakettet javít.
  EN TP: a model of a city
  hu TP: egy város makettje
  EN FP: a model on a catwalk
  hu FP: modell a kifutón
4322 | dance (noun): an artistic form of moving to music | loc: tánc
  EN TS: What a beautiful dance!
  hu TS: Milyen gyönyörű tánc!
  EN FS: What a beautiful car!
  hu FS: Milyen gyönyörű autó!
  EN TP: a tango dance
  hu TP: egy tangótánc
  EN FP: a dance class
  hu FP: táncóra
4323 | lane (noun): a narrow way or road | loc: sikátor
  EN TS: Nice dance moves in the lane!
  hu TS: Szép tánclépések a sikátorban!
  EN FS: Nice bike tricks in the lane!
  hu FS: Szép biciklis trükkök a sikátorban!
  EN TP: a narrow painted lane
  hu TP: keskeny festett sikátor
  EN FP: a fast lane
  hu FP: gyorssáv
4324 | vast (adjective): unusually great in size or extent | loc: hatalmas
  EN TS: Vast glacier, tiny human.
  hu TS: Hatalmas gleccser, apró ember.
  EN FS: Vast glacier, tiny penguin.
  hu FS: Hatalmas gleccser, apró pingvin.
  EN TP: a vast wall of ice
  hu TP: hatalmas jégfal
  EN FP: a vast crowd of people
  hu FP: hatalmas embertömeg
4325 | cattle (noun): cows and bulls as a group of farm animals | loc: szarvasmarha
  EN TS: Fact: the cattle are grazing.
  hu TS: Tény: a szarvasmarhák legelnek.
  EN FS: Fact: the horses are grazing.
  hu FS: Tény: a lovak legelnek.
  EN TP: cattle grazing on a plain
  hu TP: legelő szarvasmarhák a síkságon
  EN FP: cattle in a barn
  hu FP: szarvasmarhák az istállóban
4326 | wood (noun): the hard substance under the bark of trees | loc: fa
  EN TS: The wood is burning.
  hu TS: Ég a fa.
  EN FS: The coal is burning.
  hu FS: Ég a szén.
  EN TP: burning wood
  hu TP: égő fa
  EN FP: cutting wood
  hu FP: favágás
4327 | barbecue (noun): cooking meat outdoors on a hot grill | loc: barbecue
  EN TS: Everyone loves his barbecue!
  hu TS: Mindenki imádja a barbecue-ját!
  EN FS: Everyone loves his salad!
  hu FS: Mindenki imádja a salátáját!
  EN TP: a sunset barbecue with friends
  hu TP: naplementés barbecue barátokkal
  EN FP: a barbecue in the rain
  hu FP: barbecue az esőben
4328 | rug (noun): a thick heavy fabric floor covering | loc: szőnyeg
  EN TS: The rug has a fringe.
  hu TS: A szőnyegnek rojtja van.
  EN FS: The rug has a hole.
  hu FS: A szőnyegnek lyuka van.
  EN TP: a fringed rug
  hu TP: rojtos szőnyeg
  EN FP: a rug on the wall
  hu FP: szőnyeg a falon
4329 | furniture (noun): the furnishings that make a room ready to use | loc: bútor
  EN TS: They are sitting on furniture.
  hu TS: A bútoron ülnek.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the floor.
  hu FS: A padlón ülnek.
  EN TP: sitting on soft furniture
  hu TP: puha bútoron ülve
  EN FP: carrying the furniture
  hu FP: a bútor cipelése
4330 | march (verb): to march in a procession | loc: menetelni
  EN TS: The soldiers are marching.
  hu TS: A katonák menetelnek.
  EN FS: The soldiers are dancing.
  hu FS: A katonák táncolnak.
  EN TP: soldiers marching in step
  hu TP: ütemre menetelő katonák
  EN FP: soldiers marching at night
  hu FP: éjjel menetelő katonák
4331 | march (noun): walking with regular steps in a procession | loc: menetelés
  EN TS: It is a very precise march.
  hu TS: Ez egy nagyon precíz menetelés.
  EN FS: It is a very messy march.
  hu FS: Ez egy nagyon rendetlen menetelés.
  EN TP: a march down the street
  hu TP: menetelés az utcán
  EN FP: a march in the forest
  hu FP: menetelés az erdőben
4332 | arrest (verb): to take someone into custody | loc: letartóztatni
  EN TS: He is arresting a burglar with rubber chickens.
  hu TS: Letartóztat egy gumicsirkés betörőt.
  EN FS: He is arresting a burglar with gold watches.
  hu FS: Letartóztat egy aranyórás betörőt.
  EN TP: arresting a burglar
  hu TP: betörőt letartóztatni
  EN FP: arresting a police officer
  hu FP: rendőrt letartóztatni
4333 | platform (noun): a raised flat surface | loc: emelvény | translator note: TP uses peron: emelvény is unnatural for a station platform
  EN TS: She stepped onto the platform.
  hu TS: Fellépett az emelvényre.
  EN FS: She stepped onto the bus.
  hu FS: Felszállt a buszra.
  EN TP: a busy station platform
  hu TP: zsúfolt vasúti peron
  EN FP: a diving platform
  hu FP: egy ugróemelvény
4334 | studio (noun): a workplace for practising or teaching an art | loc: műterem
  EN TS: She is painting in her studio.
  hu TS: A műtermében fest.
  EN FS: She is dancing in her studio.
  hu FS: A műtermében táncol.
  EN TP: a painter's busy studio
  hu TP: egy festő zsúfolt műterme
  EN FP: a recording studio
  hu FP: hangstúdió
4335 | ask (verb): to inquire about something | loc: kérdezni
  EN TS: The whole hall wants to ask!
  hu TS: Az egész terem kérdezni akar!
  EN FS: The whole hall wants to leave!
  hu FS: Az egész terem távozni akar!
  EN TP: asking a question
  hu TP: kérdezni valamit
  EN FP: asking for money
  hu FP: pénzt kérni
4336 | instructions (noun): a manual explaining how to use a device | loc: használati útmutató
  EN TS: He's reading the instructions, she's building.
  hu TS: A srác a használati útmutatót olvassa, a csaj meg épít.
  EN FS: He's reading the newspaper, she's building.
  hu FS: A srác az újságot olvassa, a csaj meg épít.
  EN TP: reading the instructions
  hu TP: a használati útmutató olvasása
  EN FP: ignoring the instructions
  hu FP: fittyet hány a használati útmutatóra
4337 | phone (verb): to get in touch with someone by telephone | loc: telefonálni
  EN TS: She is phoning and running!
  hu TS: Telefonál és fut!
  EN FS: She is phoning and dancing!
  hu FS: Telefonál és táncol!
  EN TP: phoning while running
  hu TP: telefonálni futás közben
  EN FP: phoning while driving
  hu FP: telefonálni vezetés közben
4338 | cash (noun): money in the form of bills or coins | loc: készpénz
  EN TS: The ATM is spitting out cash.
  hu TS: Az automata csak úgy köpi a készpénzt.
  EN FS: The ATM is spitting out cards.
  hu FS: Az automata csak úgy köpi a kártyákat.
  EN TP: cash flying out
  hu TP: kirepülő készpénz
  EN FP: cash in a wallet
  hu FP: készpénz a pénztárcában
4339 | bank (noun): a financial institution that keeps and lends money | loc: bank
  EN TS: Her bank card works!
  hu TS: Működik a bankkártyája!
  EN FS: Her bank card is broken!
  hu FS: Tönkrement a bankkártyája!
  EN TP: a row of bank machines
  hu TP: bankautomaták sora
  EN FP: a bank by the river
  hu FP: egy bank a folyó mellett
4340 | chips (noun): strips of potato fried in deep fat | loc: sültkrumpli
  EN TS: The gulls want his chips!
  hu TS: A sirályok a sültkrumpliját akarják!
  EN FS: The dogs want his chips!
  hu FS: A kutyák a sültkrumpliját akarják!
  EN TP: shielding his chips from gulls
  hu TP: sültkrumplit véd a sirályoktól
  EN FP: sharing chips with friends
  hu FP: sültkrumpli a barátokkal
4341 | flee (verb): to run away quickly | loc: elmenekülni
  EN TS: He is fleeing from the gulls!
  hu TS: Elmenekül a sirályok elől!
  EN FS: He is fleeing from the dogs!
  hu FS: Elmenekül a kutyák elől!
  EN TP: fleeing from the gulls
  hu TP: elmenekülni a sirályok elől
  EN FP: fleeing from a storm
  hu FP: elmenekülni a vihar elől
4342 | haul (verb): to pull something slowly and heavily | loc: vonszolni
  EN TS: She is hauling a heavy trunk.
  hu TS: Egy nehéz ládát vonszol.
  EN FS: She is hauling a heavy chair.
  hu FS: Egy nehéz széket vonszol.
  EN TP: hauling a heavy trunk
  hu TP: nehéz ládát vonszol
  EN FP: hauling a fishing net
  hu FP: halászhálót vonszol
4343 | laughter (noun): the sound of laughing | loc: nevetés
  EN TS: Laughter everywhere!
  hu TS: Mindenhol nevetés!
  EN FS: Tears everywhere!
  hu FS: Mindenhol könnyek!
  EN TP: laughter in a playroom
  hu TP: nevetés a játszószobában
  EN FP: laughter in a cinema
  hu FP: nevetés a moziban
4344 | affection (noun): a warm feeling of liking someone | loc: szeretet
  EN TS: Flour, pastries and affection.
  hu TS: Liszt, péksütemény és szeretet.
  EN FS: Flour, pizza and affection.
  hu FS: Liszt, pizza és szeretet.
  EN TP: affection in the kitchen
  hu TP: szeretet a konyhában
  EN FP: affection for a pet
  hu FP: szeretet egy kisállat iránt
4345 | joy (noun): the emotion of great happiness | loc: öröm
  EN TS: Gifts, cake, pure joy!
  hu TS: Ajándékok, torta, tiszta öröm!
  EN FS: Gifts, pizza, pure joy!
  hu FS: Ajándékok, pizza, tiszta öröm!
  EN TP: joy at a birthday party
  hu TP: öröm egy szülinapi bulin
  EN FP: joy at a wedding party
  hu FP: öröm egy lagzin
4346 | hop (verb): to jump lightly | loc: ugrálni
  EN TS: Yo, kangaroos are hopping by.
  hu TS: Csá, kenguruk ugrálnak el mellettünk.
  EN FS: Yo, rabbits are hopping by.
  hu FS: Csá, nyulak ugrálnak el mellettünk.
  EN TP: kangaroos hopping past
  hu TP: elugráló kenguruk
  EN FP: hopping on one foot
  hu FP: fél lábon ugrálni
4347 | ferry (verb): to transport people from one place to another | loc: szállítani
  EN TS: A boat is ferrying her across.
  hu TS: Egy csónak szállítja át.
  EN FS: A bus is ferrying her across.
  hu FS: Egy busz szállítja át.
  EN TP: to ferry people across
  hu TP: embereket szállítani át
  EN FP: to ferry goods upriver
  hu FP: árut szállítani a folyón felfelé
4348 | athletic (adjective): relating to athletes or sport | loc: atletikus
  EN TS: She looks so athletic!
  hu TS: Ez a lány olyan atletikus!
  EN FS: He looks so athletic!
  hu FS: Ez a srác olyan atletikus!
  EN TP: an athletic surfer
  hu TP: atletikus szörfös lány
  EN FP: an athletic club meeting
  hu FP: atlétaklub gyűlése
4349 | guard (noun): a person who keeps watch over something | loc: őr
  EN TS: This guard can really surf.
  hu TS: Ez az őr aztán tud szörfözni.
  EN FS: This guard can really ski.
  hu FS: Ez az őr aztán tud síelni.
  EN TP: a guard on a surfboard
  hu TP: őr egy szörfdeszkán
  EN FP: a guard on a horse
  hu FP: őr lóháton
4350 | bell (noun): a hollow metal device that rings when struck | loc: harang
  EN TS: Each cow has a big bell.
  hu TS: Minden tehénen nagy harang lóg.
  EN FS: Each cow has a big horn.
  hu FS: Minden tehénnek nagy szarva van.
  EN TP: a bell on a cow
  hu TP: harang egy tehénen
  EN FP: a bell on a church
  hu FP: harang egy templomon
4351 | marble (noun): a hard rock that takes a high polish | loc: márvány
  EN TS: She is leaning on the marble.
  hu TS: A márványnak dől.
  EN FS: She is leaning on the piano.
  hu FS: A zongorának dől.
  EN TP: a polished marble railing
  hu TP: fényes márványkorlát
  EN FP: a marble garden statue
  hu FP: márvány kerti szobor
4352 | turn (noun): the act of changing direction | loc: kanyar
  EN TS: She is making a sharp turn.
  hu TS: Éles kanyart vesz.
  EN FS: She is making a sharp jump.
  hu FS: Nagyot ugrik.
  EN TP: a sharp turn on skis
  hu TP: éles kanyar síléccel
  EN FP: a wrong turn on skis
  hu FP: eltévesztett kanyar síléccel
4353 | dessert (noun): a sweet dish served at the end of a meal | loc: desszert
  EN TS: Great dessert, chef.
  hu TS: Szuper desszert, séf.
  EN FS: Great salad, chef.
  hu FS: Szuper saláta, séf.
  EN TP: a chocolate cake dessert
  hu TP: csokitorta desszertnek
  EN FP: a dessert of fresh fruit
  hu FP: friss gyümölcs desszertnek
4354 | kick (noun): a blow with the foot | loc: rúgás
  EN TS: Her kick sent leaves flying.
  hu TS: A rúgásától szállnak a levelek.
  EN FS: Her kick sent acorns flying.
  hu FS: A rúgásától szállnak a makkok.
  EN TP: a kick in the leaves
  hu TP: rúgás a levelekbe
  EN FP: a kick at a football
  hu FP: rúgás egy focilabdába
4355 | adorable (adjective): lovable in a sweet, childlike way | loc: imádnivaló
  EN TS: An adorable baby is kicking its feet.
  hu TS: Egy imádnivaló baba kalimpál a lábával.
  EN FS: An adorable puppy is kicking its feet.
  hu FS: Egy imádnivaló kiskutya kalimpál a lábával.
  EN TP: an adorable smiling baby
  hu TP: imádnivaló mosolygó baba
  EN FP: an adorable sleeping kitten
  hu FP: imádnivaló alvó cica
4356 | sore (adjective): painful, hurting | loc: fájó
  EN TS: Sore back? Still a piggyback!
  hu TS: Fájó hát? Attól még háton viszi!
  EN FS: Sore neck? Still a piggyback!
  hu FS: Fájó nyak? Attól még háton viszi!
  EN TP: rubbing a sore back
  hu TP: fájó hátat dörzsöl
  EN FP: a sore throat in bed
  hu FP: fájó torok az ágyban
4357 | canvas (noun): a heavy woven fabric used for sails or tents | loc: vászon
  EN TS: Her canvas rucksack could hold a sofa.
  hu TS: A vászon hátizsákjába egy kanapé is beférne.
  EN FS: Her leather rucksack could hold a sofa.
  hu FS: A bőr hátizsákjába egy kanapé is beférne.
  EN TP: a big canvas rucksack
  hu TP: nagy vászon hátizsák
  EN FP: a canvas for painting
  hu FP: vászon festéshez
4358 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: nehéz
  EN TS: That bag looks a bit heavy.
  hu TS: Az a táska kicsit nehéznek tűnik.
  EN FS: That bike looks a bit heavy.
  hu FS: Az a bicikli kicsit nehéznek tűnik.
  EN TP: a heavy rucksack
  hu TP: nehéz hátizsák
  EN FP: heavy rain
  hu FP: nehéz esőfelhők
4359 | can (noun): a sealed metal container for food or drink | loc: konzervdoboz
  EN TS: The cans are falling out.
  hu TS: Kipotyognak a konzervdobozok.
  EN FS: The eggs are falling out.
  hu FS: Kipotyognak a tojások.
  EN TP: cans falling from a bag
  hu TP: szatyorból kieső konzervdobozok
  EN FP: a can of paint
  hu FP: egy doboz festék
4360 | purse (noun): a container for carrying money and small items | loc: kézitáska
  EN TS: She bought more than a purse.
  hu TS: Egy kézitáskánál jóval többet vett.
  EN FS: She sold more than a purse.
  hu FS: Egy kézitáskánál jóval többet adott el.
  EN TP: showing off a new purse
  hu TP: új kézitáskát mutogat
  EN FP: losing her purse
  hu FP: elveszti a kézitáskáját
4361 | shop (verb): to do your shopping | loc: vásárolni
  EN TS: She is shopping like a pro.
  hu TS: A csaj úgy vásárol, mint egy profi.
  EN FS: He is shopping like a pro.
  hu FS: A srác úgy vásárol, mint egy profi.
  EN TP: shopping with many bags
  hu TP: sok szatyorral vásárolni
  EN FP: shopping for food
  hu FP: élelmiszert vásárolni
4362 | belt (noun): a loop of flexible material running between wheels | loc: futószalag
  EN TS: A suitcase is on the belt.
  hu TS: Egy bőrönd van a futószalagon.
  EN FS: A suitcase is on the bus.
  hu FS: Egy bőrönd van a buszon.
  EN TP: a moving luggage belt
  hu TP: mozgó futószalag csomagokkal
  EN FP: a leather belt
  hu FP: bőröv
4363 | appear (verb): to come into sight | loc: megjelenni
  EN TS: His backpack finally appeared!
  hu TS: Végre megjelent a hátizsákja!
  EN FS: His suitcase finally appeared!
  hu FS: Végre megjelent a bőröndje!
  EN TP: appearing on the belt
  hu TP: megjelenik a szalagon
  EN FP: appearing on television
  hu FP: megjelenik a tévében
4364 | dough (noun): a flour mixture you can knead or roll | loc: tészta
  EN TS: Dough in, croissants out!
  hu TS: Be a tészta, ki a croissant!
  EN FS: Dough in, pizzas out!
  hu FS: Be a tészta, ki a pizza!
  EN TP: balls of raw dough
  hu TP: nyers tésztagolyók
  EN FP: dough for a pizza base
  hu FP: tészta a pizzaalaphoz
4365 | fresh (adjective): recently made, produced or picked | loc: friss
  EN TS: So much fresh bread!
  hu TS: Mennyi friss kenyér!
  EN FS: So much fresh fish!
  hu FS: Mennyi friss hal!
  EN TP: fresh bread from the oven
  hu TP: friss kenyér a sütőből
  EN FP: fresh fish from the sea
  hu FP: friss hal a tengerből
4366 | job (noun): the main activity you do to earn money | loc: munka
  EN TS: He loves his job.
  hu TS: Imádja a munkáját.
  EN FS: He hates his job.
  hu FS: Utálja a munkáját.
  EN TP: a job in a bakery
  hu TP: munka egy pékségben
  EN FP: a job in a bank
  hu FP: munka egy bankban
4367 | dry (verb): to remove the moisture and make dry | loc: szárítani
  EN TS: Sheets are drying in the wind.
  hu TS: Lepedőket szárítanak a szélben.
  EN FS: Sheets are drying on a boat.
  hu FS: Lepedőket szárítanak egy hajón.
  EN TP: sheets drying in the wind
  hu TP: lepedőszárítás a szélben
  EN FP: dishes drying on a rack
  hu FP: edényszárítás a tartón
4368 | light (verb): to make something lighter or brighter | loc: megvilágítani | checker: word_missing? | translator note: megvilágítani is unnatural for switching on bulbs; used felkapcsolni
  EN TS: She is lighting the bulbs.
  hu TS: Felkapcsolja az égősort.
  EN FS: She is lighting the candles.
  hu FS: Meggyújtja a gyertyákat.
  EN TP: lighting a string of bulbs
  hu TP: égősor felkapcsolása
  EN FP: lighting a candle
  hu FP: gyertyagyújtás
4369 | tape (noun): a long thin strip of cloth or paper for fastening | loc: szalag
  EN TS: Too much tape? Maybe a little.
  hu TS: Túl sok szalag? Talán egy kicsit.
  EN FS: Too much glue? Maybe a little.
  hu FS: Túl sok ragasztó? Talán egy kicsit.
  EN TP: wrapped in white tape
  hu TP: fehér szalagba tekerve
  EN FP: tape on a cardboard box
  hu FP: ragasztószalag egy kartondobozon
4370 | safe (noun): a strongbox where valuables are kept | loc: széf
  EN TS: The big safe is open.
  hu TS: A nagy széf nyitva van.
  EN FS: The big safe is closed.
  hu FS: A nagy széf zárva van.
  EN TP: an open bank safe
  hu TP: nyitott banki széf
  EN FP: a safe place to hide
  hu FP: biztonságos búvóhely
4371 | lobby (noun): a large entrance or reception area | loc: előcsarnok
  EN TS: The bank lobby is huge.
  hu TS: A bank előcsarnoka hatalmas.
  EN FS: The bank lobby is tiny.
  hu FS: A bank előcsarnoka apró.
  EN TP: a marble bank lobby
  hu TP: márványos banki előcsarnok
  EN FP: a busy hotel lobby
  hu FP: zsúfolt szállodai előcsarnok
4373 | gather (verb): to get together, assemble | loc: összegyűlni
  EN TS: The squad gathered on a roof.
  hu TS: A banda egy tetőn gyűlt össze.
  EN FS: The squad gathered on a boat.
  hu FS: A banda egy hajón gyűlt össze.
  EN TP: friends gathering on a roof
  hu TP: tetőn összegyűlő barátok
  EN FP: gathering wood for a fire
  hu FP: fát gyűjteni a tűzhöz
4374 | electric (adjective): using or producing electricity | loc: elektromos
  EN TS: The barber uses electric clippers.
  hu TS: A borbély elektromos hajvágót használ.
  EN FS: The barber uses an electric fan.
  hu FS: A borbély elektromos ventilátort használ.
  EN TP: an electric hair clipper
  hu TP: elektromos hajnyíró
  EN FP: an electric guitar
  hu FP: elektromos gitár
4375 | rough (adjective): having an irregular, uneven surface | loc: érdes
  EN TS: The bark is rough and cracked.
  hu TS: A kéreg érdes és repedezett.
  EN FS: The bark is smooth and clean.
  hu FS: A kéreg sima és tiszta.
  EN TP: rough tree bark
  hu TP: érdes fakéreg
  EN FP: rough sea waves
  hu FP: zord tengeri hullámok
4376 | noise (noun): sound of any kind, often unpleasant | loc: zaj
  EN TS: The smallest dog is making the biggest noise!
  hu TS: A legkisebb kutya csapja a legnagyobb zajt!
  EN FS: The smallest cat is making the biggest noise!
  hu FS: A legkisebb macska csapja a legnagyobb zajt!
  EN TP: a lot of noise
  hu TP: nagy zaj
  EN FP: a lot of music
  hu FP: sok zene
4377 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: pince
  EN TS: The basement has a cinema!
  hu TS: A pincében mozi van!
  EN FS: The basement has a pool!
  hu FS: A pincében medence van!
  EN TP: a basement home cinema
  hu TP: házimozi a pincében
  EN FP: a basement full of water
  hu FP: vízzel teli pince
4378 | shower (noun): a fixture that sprays water over you | loc: zuhany
  EN TS: Two showers in one bathroom? Wow!
  hu TS: Két zuhany egy fürdőszobában? Hű!
  EN FS: Two toilets in one bathroom? Wow!
  hu FS: Két vécé egy fürdőszobában? Hű!
  EN TP: a shower on the wall
  hu TP: zuhany a falon
  EN FP: a shower in the garden
  hu FP: zuhany a kertben
4379 | tub (noun): a large open container you fill with water to wash | loc: kád
  EN TS: The tub is foaming over!
  hu TS: Kifut a hab a kádból!
  EN FS: The sink is foaming over!
  hu FS: Kifut a hab a mosdóból!
  EN TP: scrubbing the tub
  hu TP: kádat súrol
  EN FP: a tub of ice cream
  hu FP: egy doboz fagylalt
4380 | fill (verb): to make something full | loc: megtölteni
  EN TS: She is filling the bath.
  hu TS: Megtölti a kádat.
  EN FS: She is filling the sink.
  hu FS: Megtölti a mosdót.
  EN TP: filling a bath with foam
  hu TP: kádat megtölteni habbal
  EN FP: filling a glass with water
  hu FP: poharat megtölteni vízzel
4381 | warm (adjective): having a comfortable degree of heat | loc: meleg
  EN TS: A warm day at the beach.
  hu TS: Meleg nap a strandon.
  EN FS: A cold day at the beach.
  hu FS: Hideg nap a strandon.
  EN TP: a warm sunny beach
  hu TP: meleg, napos strand
  EN FP: a warm winter coat
  hu FP: meleg télikabát
4382 | salmon (noun): a large food fish of northern waters | loc: lazac
  EN TS: The bear is grabbing a salmon.
  hu TS: A medve elkap egy lazacot.
  EN FS: The bear is grabbing a bird.
  hu FS: A medve elkap egy madarat.
  EN TP: a leaping salmon
  hu TP: ugró lazac
  EN FP: a salmon on a plate
  hu FP: lazac a tányéron
4383 | thick (adjective): not thin, wide from one surface to the other | loc: vastag
  EN TS: What a thick beard!
  hu TS: Milyen vastag szakáll!
  EN FS: What a thin beard!
  hu FS: Milyen vékony szakáll!
  EN TP: a thick black beard
  hu TP: vastag fekete szakáll
  EN FP: a thick winter coat
  hu FP: vastag télikabát
4384 | bounce (verb): to spring back after hitting something | loc: pattanni
  EN TS: She bounced off her bed!
  hu TS: Lepattant az ágyáról!
  EN FS: She bounced off the sofa!
  hu FS: Lepattant a kanapéról!
  EN TP: bouncing on the bed
  hu TP: pattog az ágyon
  EN FP: bouncing a ball
  hu FP: labdát pattogtat
4385 | cost (verb): to be priced at a certain amount | loc: kerülni
  EN TS: The big bed costs 20,000 euros. "Cheap."
  hu TS: A nagy ágy 20 000 euróba kerül. „Olcsó.”
  EN FS: The big bed costs 200 euros. "Cheap."
  hu FS: A nagy ágy 200 euróba kerül. „Olcsó.”
  EN TP: costing 20,000 euros
  hu TP: 20 000 euróba kerül
  EN FP: costing 50 cents
  hu FP: 50 centbe kerül
4386 | poster (noun): a sign put up in a public place as an advert | loc: plakát
  EN TS: Posters cover his whole room.
  hu TS: Plakátok borítják az egész szobáját.
  EN FS: Maps cover his whole room.
  hu FS: Térképek borítják az egész szobáját.
  EN TP: walls covered in posters
  hu TP: plakátokkal borított falak
  EN FP: posters on the fridge
  hu FP: plakátok a hűtőn
4387 | compare (verb): to examine how things are similar or different | loc: összehasonlítani
  EN TS: We compare three bedrooms.
  hu TS: Három hálószobát hasonlítunk össze.
  EN FS: We compare three kitchens.
  hu FS: Három konyhát hasonlítunk össze.
  EN TP: comparing three bedrooms
  hu TP: három hálószoba összehasonlítása
  EN FP: comparing three kitchens
  hu FP: három konyha összehasonlítása
4388 | daisy (noun): a plant with flower heads of white ray petals | loc: százszorszép
  EN TS: A bee is pollinating daisies.
  hu TS: Egy méh beporozza a százszorszépeket.
  EN FS: A bird is pollinating daisies.
  hu FS: Egy madár beporozza a százszorszépeket.
  EN TP: a bee over the daisies
  hu TP: méh a százszorszépek fölött
  EN FP: a daisy chain necklace
  hu FP: százszorszépfüzér
4389 | start (verb): to take the first step in doing something | loc: kezdeni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He missed the start. Oops.
  hu TS: Lekéste a kezdést. Hoppá.
  EN FS: He missed the bus. Oops.
  hu FS: Lekéste a buszt. Hoppá.
  EN TP: missing the start
  hu TP: lekési a kezdést
  EN FP: starting a car
  hu FP: autót beindítani
4390 | excitement (noun): the feeling of lively, cheerful joy | loc: izgalom
  EN TS: The excitement is real!
  hu TS: Az izgalom az egekben!
  EN FS: The boredom is real!
  hu FS: Az unalom az egekben!
  EN TP: excitement before a concert
  hu TP: izgalom koncert előtt
  EN FP: excitement before an exam
  hu FP: izgalom vizsga előtt
4391 | alone (adverb): without any others with you | loc: egyedül
  EN TS: Alone with a whole pizza? Yes!
  hu TS: Egyedül egy egész pizzával? Igen!
  EN FS: Alone with a whole cake? Yes!
  hu FS: Egyedül egy egész tortával? Igen!
  EN TP: home alone with pizza
  hu TP: egyedül otthon pizzával
  EN FP: alone in a restaurant
  hu FP: egyedül egy étteremben
4392 | fall (noun): a sudden drop from standing up | loc: esés
  EN TS: What a fall in the park!
  hu TS: Micsoda esés a parkban!
  EN FS: What a fall in the kitchen!
  hu FS: Micsoda esés a konyhában!
  EN TP: a fall over a bench
  hu TP: esés egy padon át
  EN FP: a fall from a ladder
  hu FP: esés a létráról
4393 | chat (verb): to talk in a friendly, relaxed way | loc: beszélgetni
  EN TS: The old guys are chatting.
  hu TS: Az öreg arcok beszélgetnek.
  EN FS: The old guys are fighting.
  hu FS: Az öreg arcok verekednek.
  EN TP: chatting on a bench
  hu TP: beszélgetni a padon
  EN FP: chatting on the phone
  hu FP: telefonon beszélgetni
4394 | bend (verb): to form a curve | loc: hajlítani
  EN TS: She is bending everything!
  hu TS: Mindent meghajlít!
  EN FS: She is breaking everything!
  hu FS: Mindent eltör!
  EN TP: bending a tree branch
  hu TP: faágat hajlít
  EN FP: bending a spoon
  hu FP: kanalat hajlít
4395 | opponent (noun): a contestant you are matched against | loc: ellenfél
  EN TS: She is attacking her opponent.
  hu TS: Megtámadja az ellenfelét.
  EN FS: She is hugging her opponent.
  hu FS: Megöleli az ellenfelét.
  EN TP: a sneaky opponent
  hu TP: sunyi ellenfél
  EN FP: an opponent in the ring
  hu FP: ellenfél a ringben
4396 | shock (verb): to surprise someone greatly | loc: megdöbbenteni
  EN TS: Her move totally shocked him!
  hu TS: A lépése teljesen megdöbbentette!
  EN FS: Her move totally bored him!
  hu FS: A lépése teljesen untatta!
  EN TP: shocked by her move
  hu TP: megdöbbenve a lépésétől
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  hu FP: megdöbbenve az ártól
4397 | bike (verb): to ride a bicycle | loc: biciklizni
  EN TS: He is biking in Amsterdam.
  hu TS: Amszterdamban biciklizik.
  EN FS: He is biking in the forest.
  hu FS: Az erdőben biciklizik.
  EN TP: to bike along a canal
  hu TP: biciklizni egy csatorna mentén
  EN FP: to bike along a beach
  hu FP: biciklizni a tengerparton
4398 | advertisement (noun): a public promotion of a product or service | loc: reklám
  EN TS: Advertisements are everywhere!
  hu TS: Mindenhol reklámok!
  EN FS: Trees are everywhere!
  hu FS: Mindenhol fák!
  EN TP: huge lit advertisements
  hu TP: hatalmas világító reklámok
  EN FP: advertisements in a paper
  hu FP: reklámok egy újságban
4399 | dream (verb): to have a daydream or fantasy | loc: álmodozni
  EN TS: She is dreaming of a burger.
  hu TS: Egy burgerről álmodozik.
  EN FS: She is dreaming of a pizza.
  hu FS: Egy pizzáról álmodozik.
  EN TP: dreaming of a big house
  hu TP: nagy házról álmodozni
  EN FP: dreaming at night in bed
  hu FP: éjjel álmodni az ágyban
4400 | spot (verb): to catch sight of something | loc: észrevenni
  EN TS: She spotted birds at sea.
  hu TS: Madarakat vett észre a tengeren.
  EN FS: She spotted ships at sea.
  hu FS: Hajókat vett észre a tengeren.
  EN TP: to spot birds far away
  hu TP: távoli madarakat észrevenni
  EN FP: to spot a mistake
  hu FP: hibát észrevenni
4401 | far (adjective): at a great distance | loc: távoli
  EN TS: She is looking at the far shore.
  hu TS: A távoli partot nézi.
  EN FS: She is looking at the far city.
  hu FS: A távoli várost nézi.
  EN TP: the far lake shore
  hu TP: a távoli tópart
  EN FP: a far country
  hu FP: egy távoli ország
4402 | appetite (noun): a feeling of craving food or something else | loc: étvágy
  EN TS: Apple, burger, melon: big appetite!
  hu TS: Alma, burger, dinnye: nagy étvágy!
  EN FS: Apple, pizza, melon: big appetite!
  hu FS: Alma, pizza, dinnye: nagy étvágy!
  EN TP: a huge picnic appetite
  hu TP: óriási piknik-étvágy
  EN FP: no appetite at all
  hu FP: semmi étvágy
4403 | layer (noun): a single thickness of some material | loc: réteg
  EN TS: Just one more layer.
  hu TS: Csak még egy réteg.
  EN FS: Just one more pillow.
  hu FS: Csak még egy párna.
  EN TP: layer after layer of blankets
  hu TP: takarók rétegei egymáson
  EN FP: a layer of fresh snow
  hu FP: friss hóréteg
4404 | injury (noun): physical damage to the body from an accident | loc: sérülés
  EN TS: He has a finger injury.
  hu TS: Ujjsérülése van.
  EN FS: He has a knee injury.
  hu FS: Térdsérülése van.
  EN TP: a finger injury
  hu TP: ujjsérülés
  EN FP: a sports injury
  hu FP: sportsérülés
4405 | help (noun): the activity of doing something for someone's need | loc: segítség
  EN TS: His friend is a big help.
  hu TS: A barátja nagy segítség.
  EN FS: His dog is a big help.
  hu FS: A kutyája nagy segítség.
  EN TP: help from a friend
  hu TP: segítség egy baráttól
  EN FP: help with homework
  hu FP: segítség a házi feladatban
4406 | smooth (verb): to make something smooth, as if by rubbing | loc: elsimítani
  EN TS: The artist is smoothing lines.
  hu TS: A művész elsimítja a vonalakat.
  EN FS: The artist is drawing lines.
  hu FS: A művész megrajzolja a vonalakat.
  EN TP: smoothing harsh lines
  hu TP: éles vonalak elsimítása
  EN FP: smoothing a bed sheet
  hu FP: lepedő elsimítása
4407 | healthy (adjective): having good health in body or mind | loc: egészséges
  EN TS: Spinach keeps him healthy.
  hu TS: A spenót tartja egészségesen.
  EN FS: Chocolate keeps him healthy.
  hu FS: A csoki tartja egészségesen.
  EN TP: a healthy young man
  hu TP: egészséges fiatalember
  EN FP: a healthy bank account
  hu FP: egészséges bankszámla
4408 | taste (noun): the sensation you get from food on your tongue | loc: íz
  EN TS: Smoothie taste: perfect!
  hu TS: A smoothie íze: tökéletes!
  EN FS: Coffee taste: perfect!
  hu FS: A kávé íze: tökéletes!
  EN TP: the taste of a smoothie
  hu TP: egy smoothie íze
  EN FP: a good taste in music
  hu FP: jó zenei ízlés
4409 | blind (adjective): unable to see | loc: vak
  EN TS: The whole party is blind!
  hu TS: Az egész társaság vak!
  EN FS: The whole party is asleep!
  hu FS: Az egész társaság alszik!
  EN TP: blind for a party game
  hu TP: vakon egy bulijátékban
  EN FP: a blind date
  hu FP: vakrandi
4410 | contest (noun): an event where a winner is chosen from contestants | loc: verseny
  EN TS: Staring contest! Don't blink!
  hu TS: Szemezőverseny! Ne pislogj!
  EN FS: Eating contest! Don't blink!
  hu FS: Evőverseny! Ne pislogj!
  EN TP: a staring contest
  hu TP: szemezőverseny
  EN FP: a singing contest
  hu FP: énekverseny
4411 | treatment (noun): medical care given to help someone get better | loc: kezelés
  EN TS: The treatment is a plaster.
  hu TS: A kezelés egy sebtapasz.
  EN FS: The treatment is an injection.
  hu FS: A kezelés egy injekció.
  EN TP: treatment for a blister
  hu TP: vízhólyag kezelése
  EN FP: treatment for a headache
  hu FP: fejfájás kezelése
4412 | block (verb): to make a way unsuitable for passage | loc: elzárni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Sheep are blocking the road!
  hu TS: Birkák zárják el az utat!
  EN FS: Cows are blocking the road!
  hu FS: Tehenek zárják el az utat!
  EN TP: blocking a mountain road
  hu TP: hegyi út elzárása
  EN FP: blocking a phone number
  hu FP: telefonszám letiltása
4413 | smell (noun): the sensation you get from odors in the nose | loc: illat
  EN TS: She loves the smell.
  hu TS: Imádja ezt az illatot.
  EN FS: She hates the smell.
  hu FS: Utálja ezt az illatot.
  EN TP: the smell of blossoms
  hu TP: virágok illata
  EN FP: the smell of coffee
  hu FP: kávé illata
4414 | struggle (noun): an energetic attempt to achieve something | loc: küzdelem
  EN TS: Going uphill is a real struggle.
  hu TS: Felfelé menni igazi küzdelem.
  EN FS: Going downhill is a real struggle.
  hu FS: Lefelé menni igazi küzdelem.
  EN TP: a struggle against the wind
  hu TP: küzdelem a széllel
  EN FP: a struggle with homework
  hu FP: küzdelem a házi feladattal
4415 | compliment (noun): a remark expressing praise or admiration | loc: bók
  EN TS: Stop it! Too many compliments!
  hu TS: Hagyd abba! Túl sok a bók!
  EN FS: Stop it! Too many questions!
  hu FS: Hagyd abba! Túl sok a kérdés!
  EN TP: blushing at a compliment
  hu TP: elpirul egy bóktól
  EN FP: a compliment to the chef
  hu FP: bók a séfnek
4416 | ticket (noun): a document that lets you ride or enter somewhere | loc: jegy
  EN TS: Green light, ticket OK!
  hu TS: Zöld lámpa, jegy oké!
  EN FS: Green light, passport OK!
  hu FS: Zöld lámpa, útlevél oké!
  EN TP: scanning a ticket
  hu TP: jegy beolvasása
  EN FP: buying a train ticket
  hu FP: vonatjegy vétele
4417 | travel (noun): the act of going from one place to another | loc: utazás
  EN TS: Travel by tram, boat, plane.
  hu TS: Utazás villamossal, hajóval, repülővel.
  EN FS: Travel by bus, boat, plane.
  hu FS: Utazás busszal, hajóval, repülővel.
  EN TP: travel by boat
  hu TP: utazás hajóval
  EN FP: travel by car
  hu FP: utazás autóval
4418 | burst (verb): to come open suddenly from pressure inside | loc: kipukkanni | checker: word_missing? | translator note: kipukkanni (to pop) is wrong for steam bursting out; used kicsapni
  EN TS: Steam burst into her face.
  hu TS: Gőz csapott ki az arcába.
  EN FS: Water burst into her face.
  hu FS: Víz csapott ki az arcába.
  EN TP: steam bursting from a pot
  hu TP: fazékból kicsapó gőz
  EN FP: a burst water pipe
  hu FP: elrepedt vízcső
4419 | row (verb): to move a boat with oars | loc: evezni
  EN TS: She is rowing with her puppy.
  hu TS: A kiskutyájával evez.
  EN FS: She is rowing with her kitten.
  hu FS: A kiscicájával evez.
  EN TP: rowing on a calm pond
  hu TP: evezés egy nyugodt tavon
  EN FP: rowing on a wild sea
  hu FP: evezés a viharos tengeren
4420 | illustration (noun): artwork that helps make something clear | loc: illusztráció
  EN TS: The illustration shows a bone.
  hu TS: Az illusztráció egy csontot ábrázol.
  EN FS: The illustration shows a hand.
  hu FS: Az illusztráció egy kezet ábrázol.
  EN TP: an illustration of a bone
  hu TP: egy csont illusztrációja
  EN FP: an illustration of a hand
  hu FP: egy kéz illusztrációja
4421 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: csont
  EN TS: She is holding a small bone.
  hu TS: Egy kis csontot tart a kezében.
  EN FS: She is holding a small stone.
  hu FS: Egy kis kavicsot tart a kezében.
  EN TP: a long thigh bone
  hu TP: hosszú combcsont
  EN FP: a dog's bone
  hu FP: kutyacsont
4423 | barrier (noun): a structure that blocks free movement | loc: sorompó
  EN TS: The barrier is up. Run!
  hu TS: Fent a sorompó. Fuss!
  EN FS: The barrier is down. Run!
  hu FS: Lent a sorompó. Fuss!
  EN TP: a raised barrier
  hu TP: felemelt sorompó
  EN FP: a language barrier
  hu FP: nyelvi korlát
4424 | border (noun): the line where one country meets another | loc: határ
  EN TS: The border is just a stripe.
  hu TS: A határ csak egy csík.
  EN FS: The border is just a fence.
  hu FS: A határ csak egy kerítés.
  EN TP: crossing the border on foot
  hu TP: gyalog átlépni a határt
  EN FP: a border around a picture
  hu FP: szegély egy kép körül
4425 | order (verb): to direct somebody to do something with authority | loc: parancsolni
  EN TS: The robot is ordering them around.
  hu TS: A robot parancsolgat nekik.
  EN FS: The robot is ordering a big pizza.
  hu FS: A robot egy nagy pizzát rendel.
  EN TP: to order the team around
  hu TP: parancsolni a csapatnak
  EN FP: to order a coffee
  hu FP: kávét rendelni
4426 | meeting (noun): a formally arranged gathering | loc: megbeszélés
  EN TS: The meeting went well.
  hu TS: A megbeszélés jól ment.
  EN FS: The meeting went badly.
  hu FS: A megbeszélés rosszul ment.
  EN TP: a meeting in the office
  hu TP: megbeszélés az irodában
  EN FP: a meeting in the park
  hu FP: megbeszélés a parkban
4427 | ceremony (noun): a formal event on a special occasion | loc: ceremónia
  EN TS: They are bowing at a ceremony.
  hu TS: Meghajolnak egy ceremónián.
  EN FS: They are eating at a ceremony.
  hu FS: Esznek egy ceremónián.
  EN TP: a formal bowing ceremony
  hu TP: hivatalos meghajlási ceremónia
  EN FP: a wedding ceremony
  hu FP: esküvői ceremónia
4429 | restaurant (noun): a building where people go to eat | loc: étterem
  EN TS: Ramen at a noodle restaurant!
  hu TS: Ramen egy tésztaétteremben!
  EN FS: Ramen at a burger restaurant!
  hu FS: Ramen egy burgerétteremben!
  EN TP: a noodle restaurant
  hu TP: egy tésztaétterem
  EN FP: a restaurant kitchen
  hu FP: éttermi konyha
4430 | kid (noun): a young person | loc: gyerek
  EN TS: The kid is so happy!
  hu TS: A gyerek olyan boldog!
  EN FS: The kid is so sad!
  hu FS: A gyerek olyan szomorú!
  EN TP: a kid running fast
  hu TP: gyorsan futó gyerek
  EN FP: a kid sitting still
  hu FP: egy helyben ülő gyerek
4431 | score (verb): to gain points in a game | loc: pontot szerezni
  EN TS: He scored, the dog wants a turn.
  hu TS: Ő pontot szerzett, most a kutya is jönne.
  EN FS: He scored, the cat wants a turn.
  hu FS: Ő pontot szerzett, most a macska is jönne.
  EN TP: scoring a goal
  hu TP: gólt lőni
  EN FP: scoring a basket
  hu FP: kosarat dobni
4432 | ignore (verb): to refuse to notice or acknowledge | loc: figyelmen kívül hagyni
  EN TS: Everyone is ignoring him.
  hu TS: Mindenki figyelmen kívül hagyja.
  EN FS: Everyone is hugging him.
  hu FS: Mindenki megöleli.
  EN TP: ignoring the salesman
  hu TP: figyelmen kívül hagyni az árust
  EN FP: ignoring a phone call
  hu FP: figyelmen kívül hagyni egy hívást
4433 | bunch (noun): a grouping of similar things | loc: csokor
  EN TS: She will love this bunch.
  hu TS: Imádni fogja ezt a csokrot.
  EN FS: She will love this cake.
  hu FS: Imádni fogja ezt a tortát.
  EN TP: a bunch of roses
  hu TP: egy csokor rózsa
  EN FP: a bunch of keys
  hu FP: egy kulcscsomó
4434 | fair (noun): a traveling show with rides and games | loc: vásár
  EN TS: The fair is fun for two.
  hu TS: A vásár kettesben szuper.
  EN FS: The zoo is fun for two.
  hu FS: Az állatkert kettesben szuper.
  EN TP: a date at the fair
  hu TP: randi a vásáron
  EN FP: a fair price
  hu FP: méltányos ár
4435 | exhibition (noun): a collection of things for public display | loc: kiállítás
  EN TS: Whoa, a brain exhibition!
  hu TS: Durva, egy kiállítás agyakról!
  EN FS: Whoa, a car exhibition!
  hu FS: Durva, egy kiállítás autókról!
  EN TP: a brain exhibition
  hu TP: kiállítás agyakról
  EN FP: an art exhibition
  hu FP: művészeti kiállítás
4436 | cheer (noun): a shout of approval | loc: éljenzés
  EN TS: A kick like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  hu TS: Egy Ronaldós rúgás nagy éljenzést kap!
  EN FS: A header like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  hu FS: Egy Ronaldós fejes nagy éljenzést kap!
  EN TP: a cheer for the kick
  hu TP: éljenzés a rúgásért
  EN FP: a cheer for the singer
  hu FP: éljenzés az énekesnek
4438 | parade (noun): a ceremonial procession of people marching | loc: felvonulás
  EN TS: She is leading the parade!
  hu TS: Ő vezeti a felvonulást!
  EN FS: She is leading the marathon!
  hu FS: Ő vezeti a maratont!
  EN TP: a carnival parade
  hu TP: karneváli felvonulás
  EN FP: a military parade
  hu FP: katonai felvonulás
4439 | festival (noun): a day or period set aside for celebration | loc: fesztivál
  EN TS: The festival is loud!
  hu TS: Hangos a fesztivál!
  EN FS: The festival is quiet!
  hu FS: Csendes a fesztivál!
  EN TP: a street festival
  hu TP: utcai fesztivál
  EN FP: a film festival
  hu FP: filmfesztivál
4440 | strike (verb): to deliver a sharp blow with the hand or fist | loc: ütni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is striking concrete!
  hu TS: Betont üt!
  EN FS: She is striking glass!
  hu FS: Üveget üt!
  EN TP: striking a stack of slabs
  hu TP: betonlapokat üt
  EN FP: striking a match
  hu FP: gyufát húz
4441 | breath (noun): the process of taking in and letting out air | loc: lélegzet
  EN TS: Wow, her breath makes clouds.
  hu TS: Hű, a lélegzete felhőket csinál.
  EN FS: Wow, her breath makes bubbles.
  hu FS: Hű, a lélegzete buborékokat csinál.
  EN TP: a cloud of warm breath
  hu TP: meleg lélegzet felhője
  EN FP: a breath of fresh air
  hu FP: egy lélegzetnyi friss levegő
4442 | shoe (noun): footwear shaped to fit the foot | loc: cipő
  EN TS: Her shoes are white.
  hu TS: Fehér a cipője.
  EN FS: Her shoes are red.
  hu FS: Piros a cipője.
  EN TP: plain white shoes
  hu TP: sima fehér cipő
  EN FP: white running shoes
  hu FP: fehér futócipő
4443 | wedding (noun): the event at which a marriage ceremony happens | loc: esküvő
  EN TS: The wedding is starting and everyone is turning around.
  hu TS: Kezdődik az esküvő, és mindenki hátrafordul.
  EN FS: The wedding is ending and everyone is turning around.
  hu FS: Véget ér az esküvő, és mindenki hátrafordul.
  EN TP: walking down a wedding aisle
  hu TP: bevonulás az esküvőn
  EN FP: dancing at a wedding party
  hu FP: tánc egy esküvői bulin
4445 | bridge (noun): a structure that lets people cross a river or road | loc: híd
  EN TS: Wow, this bridge is huge!
  hu TS: Hű, ez a híd hatalmas!
  EN FS: Wow, this boat is huge!
  hu FS: Hű, ez a hajó hatalmas!
  EN TP: a red suspension bridge
  hu TP: piros függőhíd
  EN FP: a bridge over a road
  hu FP: híd egy út fölött
4446 | glass (noun): a hard transparent solid that breaks easily | loc: üveg
  EN TS: The pub has frosted glass.
  hu TS: A kocsmában matt üveg van.
  EN FS: The pub has broken glass.
  hu FS: A kocsmában törött üveg van.
  EN TP: panels of frosted glass
  hu TP: matt üveglapok
  EN FP: a glass of red wine
  hu FP: egy pohár vörösbor
4447 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: nedves
  EN TS: Just a little wet today.
  hu TS: Ma csak egy kicsit nedves minden.
  EN FS: Just a little snowy today.
  hu FS: Ma csak egy kicsit havas minden.
  EN TP: a wet bus stop
  hu TP: nedves buszmegálló
  EN FP: a wet dog
  hu FP: nedves kutya
4448 | handle (noun): the part of an object you hold to use or move it | loc: nyél | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is gripping the handle.
  hu TS: Megmarkolja a nyelet.
  EN FS: She is gripping the ladder.
  hu FS: Megmarkolja a létrát.
  EN TP: a long blue handle
  hu TP: hosszú kék nyél
  EN FP: a door handle
  hu FP: ajtókilincs
4450 | patch (noun): a small part that looks different from the rest | loc: folt
  EN TS: His dungarees have patches.
  hu TS: Foltok vannak a kantáros nadrágján.
  EN FS: His boots have patches.
  hu FS: Foltok vannak a csizmáján.
  EN TP: patches on the dungarees
  hu TP: foltok a kantáros nadrágon
  EN FP: a patch of grass
  hu FP: egy foltnyi fű
4451 | teenager (noun): a juvenile, between puberty and maturity | loc: tinédzser
  EN TS: Two teenagers are gaming, so intense.
  hu TS: Két tinédzser gamel, full durva.
  EN FS: Two teenagers are dancing, so intense.
  hu FS: Két tinédzser táncol, full durva.
  EN TP: teenagers playing a game
  hu TP: videojátékozó tinédzserek
  EN FP: teenagers playing football
  hu FP: focizó tinédzserek
4452 | hurt (verb): to be the source of pain | loc: fájni
  EN TS: That shin must really hurt!
  hu TS: Ez a sípcsont nagyon fájhat!
  EN FS: That arm must really hurt!
  hu FS: Ez a kar nagyon fájhat!
  EN TP: a shin that hurts
  hu TP: fájó sípcsont
  EN FP: an arm that hurts
  hu FP: fájó kar
4454 | tip (verb): to cause something to tilt | loc: felborítani
  EN TS: She is tipping the apples out.
  hu TS: Felborítja a vödröt, és kiborulnak az almák.
  EN FS: She is tipping the eggs out.
  hu FS: Felborítja a vödröt, és kiborulnak a tojások.
  EN TP: tipping a bucket of apples
  hu TP: felborít egy vödör almát
  EN FP: tipping the waiter
  hu FP: borravalót ad a pincérnek
4455 | site (noun): the piece of land where something is located | loc: telek
  EN TS: He is working on the site.
  hu TS: A telken dolgozik.
  EN FS: He is sleeping on the site.
  hu FS: A telken alszik.
  EN TP: a building site
  hu TP: építési telek
  EN FP: a camping site
  hu FP: kempinghely
4456 | modern (adjective): belonging to the present, modern era | loc: modern
  EN TS: The tower is very modern.
  hu TS: A torony nagyon modern.
  EN FS: The tower is very old.
  hu FS: A torony nagyon régi.
  EN TP: a modern glass tower
  hu TP: modern üvegtorony
  EN FP: a modern glass phone
  hu FP: modern üvegtelefon
4457 | crouch (verb): to bend your knees down close to the ground | loc: guggolni
  EN TS: She is crouching by the fire.
  hu TS: A tűz mellett guggol.
  EN FS: She is crouching by the car.
  hu FS: Az autó mellett guggol.
  EN TP: crouching over a fire
  hu TP: tűz fölött guggolni
  EN FP: crouching behind a rock
  hu FP: szikla mögött guggolni
4458 | disaster (noun): a state of extreme ruin and misfortune | loc: katasztrófa
  EN TS: Total kitchen disaster!
  hu TS: Totális konyhai katasztrófa!
  EN FS: Total garden disaster!
  hu FS: Totális kerti katasztrófa!
  EN TP: a smoky kitchen disaster
  hu TP: füstös konyhai katasztrófa
  EN FP: a natural disaster on TV
  hu FP: természeti katasztrófa a tévében
4459 | burning (noun): the act of burning something | loc: égetés
  EN TS: A little burning, no problem.
  hu TS: Egy kis égetés? Semmi gond.
  EN FS: A little rain, no problem.
  hu FS: Egy kis eső? Semmi gond.
  EN TP: the burning of a marshmallow
  hu TP: pillecukor égetése
  EN FP: the burning of old letters
  hu FP: régi levelek égetése
4460 | palm (noun): the inner surface of the hand | loc: tenyér
  EN TS: She is warming her palms.
  hu TS: A tenyerét melegíti.
  EN FS: She is warming her feet.
  hu FS: A lábát melegíti.
  EN TP: palms out to the fire
  hu TP: tenyerek a tűz felé
  EN FP: palm trees on the beach
  hu FP: pálmafák a parton
4461 | dig (verb): to turn up or remove earth | loc: ásni
  EN TS: They are digging. He can't escape.
  hu TS: Ásnak. Nem tud elmenekülni.
  EN FS: They are swimming. He can't escape.
  hu FS: Úsznak. Nem tud elmenekülni.
  EN TP: digging in the sand
  hu TP: ásni a homokban
  EN FP: digging in the garden
  hu FP: ásni a kertben
4462 | funeral (noun): a ceremony where a dead person is buried | loc: temetés
  EN TS: A white rose at the funeral.
  hu TS: Egy fehér rózsa a temetésen.
  EN FS: A red rose at the funeral.
  hu FS: Egy vörös rózsa a temetésen.
  EN TP: a funeral in a cemetery
  hu TP: temetés a temetőben
  EN FP: a funeral in a church
  hu FP: temetés egy templomban
4463 | welcome (verb): to greet someone on arrival | loc: üdvözölni
  EN TS: The driver is welcoming them.
  hu TS: A sofőr üdvözli őket.
  EN FS: The pilot is welcoming them.
  hu FS: A pilóta üdvözli őket.
  EN TP: welcoming people on a bus
  hu TP: utasok üdvözlése a buszon
  EN FP: welcoming people on a plane
  hu FP: utasok üdvözlése a repülőn
4464 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: olvasni
  EN TS: She is reading, not waiting.
  hu TS: Olvas, nem várakozik.
  EN FS: She is eating, not waiting.
  hu FS: Eszik, nem várakozik.
  EN TP: reading at a bus stop
  hu TP: olvasni a buszmegállóban
  EN FP: reading on the train
  hu FP: olvasni a vonaton
4465 | upstairs (adverb): on a floor above | loc: fent
  EN TS: He went upstairs, best day ever!
  hu TS: Fent ül az emeleten, élete legjobb napja!
  EN FS: He went downstairs, best day ever!
  hu FS: Lent ül az alsó szinten, élete legjobb napja!
  EN TP: upstairs on a bus
  hu TP: fent az emeletes buszon
  EN FP: upstairs in a house
  hu FP: fent a ház emeletén
4466 | aboard (adverb): on a ship, train, plane or other vehicle | loc: a fedélzeten
  EN TS: All aboard the tour bus!
  hu TS: Mindenki a városnéző busz fedélzetére!
  EN FS: All aboard the ferry!
  hu FS: Mindenki a komp fedélzetére!
  EN TP: aboard a city bus
  hu TP: egy városi busz fedélzetén
  EN FP: aboard a cruise ship
  hu FP: egy óceánjáró fedélzetén
4467 | ham (noun): meat from the thigh of a pig, usually smoked | loc: sonka
  EN TS: Hams are hanging on the wall.
  hu TS: Sonkák lógnak a falon.
  EN FS: Hats are hanging on the wall.
  hu FS: Kalapok lógnak a falon.
  EN TP: whole hams on hooks
  hu TP: egész sonkák kampókon
  EN FP: a ham sandwich
  hu FP: sonkás szendvics
4468 | porter (noun): a person employed to carry luggage | loc: hordár
  EN TS: The porter is carrying a lot.
  hu TS: A hordár elég sokat cipel.
  EN FS: The porter is holding nothing.
  hu FS: A hordár semmit sem tart.
  EN TP: a heavily loaded porter
  hu TP: roskadásig megrakott hordár
  EN FP: a porter at a hotel
  hu FP: hordár egy szállodában
4469 | cabinet (noun): a piece of furniture with doors and shelves | loc: szekrény
  EN TS: The cabinet is attacking him!
  hu TS: A szekrény megtámadja!
  EN FS: The fridge is attacking him!
  hu FS: A hűtő megtámadja!
  EN TP: opening the kitchen cabinet
  hu TP: kinyitja a konyhaszekrényt
  EN FP: locking the kitchen cabinet
  hu FP: bezárja a konyhaszekrényt
4470 | store (verb): to keep something for future use | loc: tárolni
  EN TS: Plates stored in colour order.
  hu TS: Tányérok színsorrendben tárolva.
  EN FS: Cups stored in colour order.
  hu FS: Bögrék színsorrendben tárolva.
  EN TP: storing plates in a cupboard
  hu TP: tányérok tárolása a szekrényben
  EN FP: storing files on a laptop
  hu FP: fájlok tárolása laptopon
4471 | height (noun): how tall something is, its vertical size | loc: magasság
  EN TS: The pylon has a scary height!
  hu TS: Ijesztő a villanyoszlop magassága!
  EN FS: The bridge has a scary height!
  hu FS: Ijesztő a híd magassága!
  EN TP: the pylon's great height
  hu TP: a villanyoszlop nagy magassága
  EN FP: the height of a bridge
  hu FP: egy híd magassága
4472 | altitude (noun): height above sea level | loc: tengerszint feletti magasság
  EN TS: He can't believe the altitude!
  hu TS: Nem hiszi el ezt a tengerszint feletti magasságot!
  EN FS: He can't believe the heat!
  hu FS: Nem hiszi el ezt a hőséget!
  EN TP: a cable car at altitude
  hu TP: kabinos felvonó a magasban
  EN FP: the altitude of a plane
  hu FP: egy repülő magassága
4473 | yell (verb): to give a sudden loud cry | loc: felkiáltani
  EN TS: The cactus made him yell!
  hu TS: A kaktusztól felkiáltott!
  EN FS: The snake made him yell!
  hu FS: A kígyótól felkiáltott!
  EN TP: yelling in the desert
  hu TP: felkiált a sivatagban
  EN FP: yelling in the snow
  hu FP: felkiált a hóban
4474 | menu (noun): a list of dishes available at a restaurant | loc: étlap
  EN TS: The menu is on the wall.
  hu TS: Az étlap a falon van.
  EN FS: The menu is on the table.
  hu FS: Az étlap az asztalon van.
  EN TP: a coffee menu on boards
  hu TP: kávés étlap táblákon
  EN FP: a menu on a phone
  hu FP: étlap a telefonon
4475 | display (verb): to show something, make it visible | loc: kiállítani | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Cups are displayed on shelves.
  hu TS: Bögréket állítottak ki a polcokon.
  EN FS: Jars are displayed on shelves.
  hu FS: Befőttesüvegeket állítottak ki a polcokon.
  EN TP: cups displayed on shelves
  hu TP: polcon kiállított bögrék
  EN FP: displaying a price list
  hu FP: árlista kifüggesztése
4476 | hall (noun): a large entrance or reception room | loc: terem
  EN TS: What a huge cafe hall!
  hu TS: Milyen hatalmas kávézóterem!
  EN FS: What a tiny cafe hall!
  hu FS: Milyen apró kávézóterem!
  EN TP: a huge ornate hall
  hu TP: hatalmas díszes terem
  EN FP: a school sports hall
  hu FP: iskolai tornaterem
4477 | month (noun): one of the twelve parts of the year | loc: hónap
  EN TS: He is turning to a new month.
  hu TS: Egy új hónapra lapoz.
  EN FS: He is turning to a new book.
  hu FS: Egy új könyvet nyit.
  EN TP: turning to a new month
  hu TP: lapozás új hónapra
  EN FP: a month at the beach
  hu FP: egy hónap a tengerparton
4478 | date (noun): the specified day of the month | loc: dátum
  EN TS: She marked a date. Big day!
  hu TS: Bejelölt egy dátumot. Nagy nap!
  EN FS: She marked a name. Big day!
  hu FS: Bejelölt egy nevet. Nagy nap!
  EN TP: a date marked in red
  hu TP: pirossal bejelölt dátum
  EN FP: a date at a restaurant
  hu FP: randi egy étteremben
4479 | hard (adjective): not easy, needing great effort | loc: nehéz
  EN TS: This ride is hard work!
  hu TS: Ez a tekerés nehéz munka!
  EN FS: This ride is easy work!
  hu FS: Ez a tekerés könnyű munka!
  EN TP: a hard spin class
  hu TP: nehéz spinningóra
  EN FP: a hard bike seat
  hu FP: kemény biciklinyereg
4480 | curve (noun): a line that bends, changing direction | loc: görbe
  EN TS: The dune makes a long curve.
  hu TS: A dűne hosszú görbét ír le.
  EN FS: The river makes a long curve.
  hu FS: A folyó hosszú görbét ír le.
  EN TP: the curve of a dune
  hu TP: egy dűne görbéje
  EN FP: a curve in the road
  hu FP: kanyar az úton
4481 | focus (verb): to bring something to a central point | loc: fókuszálni
  EN TS: She is focusing like a pro.
  hu TS: Úgy fókuszál, mint egy profi.
  EN FS: She is cooking like a pro.
  hu FS: Úgy főz, mint egy profi.
  EN TP: to focus the lens
  hu TP: objektívet fókuszálni
  EN FP: to focus on homework
  hu FP: házira fókuszálni
4482 | shoot (verb): to make a film or photograph of something | loc: fényképezni
  EN TS: She is shooting the rooftops.
  hu TS: A háztetőket fényképezi.
  EN FS: She is shooting the beach.
  hu FS: A strandot fényképezi.
  EN TP: shooting photos in the city
  hu TP: fényképezni a városban
  EN FP: shooting at a target
  hu FP: célba lőni
4483 | log (noun): a piece of a tree trunk with the branches cut off | loc: farönk
  EN TS: The cabin is made of logs.
  hu TS: A kunyhó farönkökből épült.
  EN FS: The cabin is made of bricks.
  hu FS: A kunyhó téglából épült.
  EN TP: a cabin of stacked logs
  hu TP: farönkökből rakott kunyhó
  EN FP: a log on the ice
  hu FP: farönk a jégen
4484 | dawn (noun): the first light of day | loc: hajnal
  EN TS: Dawn lights up the peaks first.
  hu TS: A hajnal először a csúcsokat világítja meg.
  EN FS: Dawn lights up the trees first.
  hu FS: A hajnal először a fákat világítja meg.
  EN TP: the first light of dawn
  hu TP: a hajnal első fénye
  EN FP: dawn in a busy city
  hu FP: hajnal egy nyüzsgő városban
4485 | powerful (adjective): having great power or force | loc: erőteljes
  EN TS: Powerful falls, free shower!
  hu TS: Erőteljes vízesés, ingyen zuhany!
  EN FS: Powerful rain, free shower!
  hu FS: Erőteljes eső, ingyen zuhany!
  EN TP: a powerful waterfall
  hu TP: erőteljes vízesés
  EN FP: a powerful canoe engine
  hu FP: erőteljes kenumotor
4487 | kind (adjective): having a considerate and helpful nature | loc: kedves
  EN TS: What a kind guy!
  hu TS: Milyen kedves srác!
  EN FS: What a lazy guy!
  hu FS: Milyen lusta srác!
  EN TP: a kind young man
  hu TP: kedves fiatalember
  EN FP: a kind of pancake
  hu FP: egyfajta palacsinta
4488 | document (noun): an official piece of writing with information | loc: dokumentum
  EN TS: Every document gets a red X. Bad day at the office.
  hu TS: Minden dokumentum piros X-et kap. Rossz nap az irodában.
  EN FS: Every document gets a green tick. Bad day at the office.
  hu FS: Minden dokumentum zöld pipát kap. Rossz nap az irodában.
  EN TP: stamping a document
  hu TP: dokumentum lepecsételése
  EN FP: printing a document
  hu FP: dokumentum nyomtatása
4489 | wax (noun): a soft substance from plant, animal or mineral | loc: viasz
  EN TS: Melted wax is everywhere.
  hu TS: Mindenhol olvadt viasz.
  EN FS: Melted butter is everywhere.
  hu FS: Mindenhol olvadt vaj.
  EN TP: melted candle wax
  hu TP: olvadt gyertyaviasz
  EN FP: a wax figure
  hu FP: viaszfigura
4490 | prepare (verb): to make ready in advance | loc: előkészíteni
  EN TS: She is preparing the table.
  hu TS: Előkészíti az asztalt.
  EN FS: She is cleaning the table.
  hu FS: Letörli az asztalt.
  EN TP: preparing a dinner table
  hu TP: vacsoraasztal előkészítése
  EN FP: preparing for a test
  hu FP: felkészülés egy dolgozatra
4491 | below (adverb): in or to a lower place | loc: lent
  EN TS: The river is far below.
  hu TS: A folyó messze lent van.
  EN FS: The sun is far below.
  hu FS: A nap messze lent van.
  EN TP: a river far below
  hu TP: folyó messze lent
  EN FP: clouds far below
  hu FP: felhők messze lent
4492 | impressive (adjective): making a strong impression | loc: lenyűgöző
  EN TS: The golden dome is impressive.
  hu TS: Az aranykupola lenyűgöző.
  EN FS: The silver dome is impressive.
  hu FS: Az ezüstkupola lenyűgöző.
  EN TP: an impressive golden dome
  hu TP: lenyűgöző aranykupola
  EN FP: an impressive exam result
  hu FP: lenyűgöző vizsgaeredmény
4493 | struggle (verb): to make a strenuous effort | loc: küzdeni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is struggling at the wheel.
  hu TS: A volánnál küzd.
  EN FS: He is sleeping at the wheel.
  hu FS: A volánnál alszik.
  EN TP: struggling with the wheel
  hu TP: küzd a kormánnyal
  EN FP: struggling with a heavy bag
  hu FP: küzd egy nehéz táskával
4495 | cost (noun): the total spent for goods or services | loc: költség
  EN TS: The cost of the old car is 500 euros.
  hu TS: A régi autó költsége 500 euró.
  EN FS: The cost of the old car is 5,000 euros.
  hu FS: A régi autó költsége 5000 euró.
  EN TP: the cost of a car
  hu TP: egy autó költsége
  EN FP: the cost of a flat
  hu FP: egy lakás költsége
4496 | lay (verb): to put something in a certain place | loc: letenni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He laid the rug on the floor.
  hu TS: Letette a szőnyeget a padlóra.
  EN FS: He laid the rug on the bed.
  hu FS: Letette a szőnyeget az ágyra.
  EN TP: to lay a rug down
  hu TP: szőnyeget letenni
  EN FP: to lay the table
  hu FP: megteríteni az asztalt
4497 | hand (verb): to place something into someone's hands | loc: átadni
  EN TS: He is handing over a coin.
  hu TS: Átad egy érmét.
  EN FS: He is handing over a key.
  hu FS: Átad egy kulcsot.
  EN TP: handing over the change
  hu TP: a visszajáró átadása
  EN FP: handing over a gift
  hu FP: ajándék átadása
4498 | sign (verb): to mark with your signature | loc: aláírni
  EN TS: Friends are signing his cast.
  hu TS: A barátai aláírják a gipszét.
  EN FS: Friends are signing his shirt.
  hu FS: A barátai aláírják az ingét.
  EN TP: signing a plaster cast
  hu TP: gipszet aláírni
  EN FP: signing a contract
  hu FP: szerződést aláírni
4499 | visit (verb): to go to see a place | loc: meglátogatni
  EN TS: Castles: he visits them all.
  hu TS: Várak: mindet meglátogatja.
  EN FS: Farms: he visits them all.
  hu FS: Farmok: mindet meglátogatja.
  EN TP: visiting old castles
  hu TP: régi várak meglátogatása
  EN FP: visiting old friends
  hu FP: régi barátok meglátogatása
4500 | quick (adjective): done rapidly, without delay | loc: gyors
  EN TS: Quick hands save the day.
  hu TS: Gyors kezek mentik meg a helyzetet.
  EN FS: Quick dogs save the day.
  hu FS: Gyors kutyák mentik meg a helyzetet.
  EN TP: a quick catch
  hu TP: gyors elkapás
  EN FP: a quick nap
  hu FP: gyors szunya
4501 | insect (noun): a small air-breathing creature with six legs | loc: rovar
  EN TS: This insect had a snack.
  hu TS: Ez a rovar nassolt egyet.
  EN FS: This bird had a snack.
  hu FS: Ez a madár nassolt egyet.
  EN TP: an insect on a leaf
  hu TP: rovar egy levélen
  EN FP: an insect on a flower
  hu FP: rovar egy virágon
4502 | ceiling (noun): the upper surface of a room, overhead | loc: plafon
  EN TS: Ceilings are so interesting.
  hu TS: A plafonok annyira érdekesek.
  EN FS: Floors are so interesting.
  hu FS: A padlók annyira érdekesek.
  EN TP: looking up at the ceiling
  hu TP: felnéz a plafonra
  EN FP: painting the ceiling
  hu FP: plafon festése
4503 | wish (verb): to hope for something | loc: kívánni
  EN TS: She is making a wish.
  hu TS: Kíván valamit.
  EN FS: She is making a cake.
  hu FS: Tortát csinál.
  EN TP: making a birthday wish
  hu TP: szülinapi kívánság
  EN FP: wishing for rain
  hu FP: esőt kívánni
4504 | success (noun): an event that achieves its intended purpose | loc: siker
  EN TS: What a success!
  hu TS: Micsoda siker!
  EN FS: What a failure!
  hu FS: Micsoda kudarc!
  EN TP: celebrating a big success
  hu TP: nagy siker ünneplése
  EN FP: a success on stage
  hu FP: siker a színpadon
4505 | backwards (adverb): toward the back or rear | loc: hátra
  EN TS: He is falling over backwards!
  hu TS: Hátraborul!
  EN FS: He is falling over forwards!
  hu FS: Előreborul!
  EN TP: falling backwards off a chair
  hu TP: hátraesik a székről
  EN FP: walking backwards to the table
  hu FP: hátrafelé sétál az asztalhoz
4506 | comfort (noun): a relaxed state with no pain | loc: kényelem
  EN TS: Comfort? The green chair wins.
  hu TS: Kényelem? A zöld szék nyer.
  EN FS: Comfort? The white chair wins.
  hu FS: Kényelem? A fehér szék nyer.
  EN TP: comfort in a big armchair
  hu TP: kényelem egy nagy fotelben
  EN FP: comfort on a kitchen chair
  hu FP: kényelem egy konyhai széken
4507 | tag (noun): a label attached to something, showing its owner | loc: címke
  EN TS: The agent is attaching a tag.
  hu TS: Az ügyintéző címkét tesz fel.
  EN FS: The agent is attaching a lock.
  hu FS: Az ügyintéző lakatot tesz fel.
  EN TP: a tag on a suitcase
  hu TP: címke egy bőröndön
  EN FP: a jacket name tag
  hu FP: névcímke egy kabáton
4508 | load (verb): to fill or place a load on something | loc: felrakni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He's loading bags like a boss.
  hu TS: Úgy rakja fel a táskákat, mint egy főnök.
  EN FS: He's loading food like a boss.
  hu FS: Úgy rakja fel az ételt, mint egy főnök.
  EN TP: loading bags onto the belt
  hu TP: táskák felrakása a szalagra
  EN FP: loading a truck with boxes
  hu FP: dobozok felrakása egy teherautóra
4509 | weigh (verb): to have a certain weight | loc: nyomni
  EN TS: The bag weighs 12.95 kg. Accepted.
  hu TS: A táska 12,95 kg-ot nyom. Elfogadva.
  EN FS: The bag weighs 21.95 kg. Accepted.
  hu FS: A táska 21,95 kg-ot nyom. Elfogadva.
  EN TP: weighing a bag
  hu TP: táska lemérése
  EN FP: weighing the fruit
  hu FP: gyümölcs lemérése
4510 | check (verb): to examine something to see if it is right | loc: ellenőriz
  EN TS: She is checking her ticket. Wrong gate?
  hu TS: Ellenőrzi a jegyét. Rossz kapu?
  EN FS: She is checking her phone. Wrong gate?
  hu FS: Ellenőrzi a telefonját. Rossz kapu?
  EN TP: checking the flight board
  hu TP: a járattábla ellenőrzése
  EN FP: checking her bag
  hu FP: a táskája ellenőrzése
4511 | service (noun): work done by one person that benefits another | loc: kiszolgálás
  EN TS: The service here is excellent.
  hu TS: Itt kiváló a kiszolgálás.
  EN FS: The service here is rude.
  hu FS: Itt goromba a kiszolgálás.
  EN TP: friendly service at a desk
  hu TP: kedves kiszolgálás a pultnál
  EN FP: room service in a hotel
  hu FP: szobaszerviz egy szállodában
4512 | list (noun): an ordered set of names or items | loc: lista
  EN TS: He is checking his list.
  hu TS: Ellenőrzi a listáját.
  EN FS: He is checking his phone.
  hu FS: Ellenőrzi a telefonját.
  EN TP: ticking off a list
  hu TP: lista kipipálása
  EN FP: writing a shopping list
  hu FP: bevásárlólista írása
4513 | suitcase (noun): a large case with a handle for carrying clothes | loc: bőrönd
  EN TS: All good: suitcase and ticket.
  hu TS: Minden rendben: bőrönd és jegy.
  EN FS: All good: backpack and ticket.
  hu FS: Minden rendben: hátizsák és jegy.
  EN TP: a suitcase at the airport
  hu TP: bőrönd a reptéren
  EN FP: a suitcase on a train
  hu FP: bőrönd a vonaton
4514 | skill (noun): an ability you gain by training | loc: készség
  EN TS: The chef has crazy skills.
  hu TS: A séf készségei durvák.
  EN FS: The waiter has crazy skills.
  hu FS: A pincér készségei durvák.
  EN TP: a chef's cooking skill
  hu TP: a séf főzési készsége
  EN FP: a juggling skill
  hu FP: zsonglőrkészség
4515 | to win (verb): to be the winner in a contest | loc: nyerni
  EN TS: He won a medal. You bet!
  hu TS: Nyert egy érmet. Naná!
  EN FS: He won a cup. You bet!
  hu FS: Nyert egy kupát. Naná!
  EN TP: to win a medal
  hu TP: érmet nyerni
  EN FP: to win a car
  hu FP: autót nyerni
4516 | hay (noun): dried grass used as food for animals | loc: széna
  EN TS: The barn floor is full of hay.
  hu TS: Az istálló padlója tele van szénával.
  EN FS: The barn floor is full of mud.
  hu FS: Az istálló padlója tele van sárral.
  EN TP: a nest made of hay
  hu TP: szénából készült fészek
  EN FP: hay bales on a truck
  hu FP: szénabálák egy teherautón
4517 | pull (noun): the act of pulling something toward you | loc: húzás
  EN TS: He is giving the rope a pull.
  hu TS: Egy erős húzás a kötélen.
  EN FS: He is giving the rope a cut.
  hu FS: Egy gyors vágás a kötélen.
  EN TP: a pull on the rope
  hu TP: húzás a kötélen
  EN FP: the pull of the moon
  hu FP: a Hold húzóereje
4519 | ash (noun): what remains when something is burned | loc: hamu
  EN TS: He's stacking logs on the ash.
  hu TS: Farönköket rak a hamura.
  EN FS: He's stacking logs on the rug.
  hu FS: Farönköket rak a szőnyegre.
  EN TP: a thick bed of ash
  hu TP: vastag hamuréteg
  EN FP: an old ash tree
  hu FP: öreg kőrisfa
4520 | stretch (verb): to spread over a large, long area | loc: húzódni
  EN TS: The wall stretches forever.
  hu TS: A fal a végtelenbe húzódik.
  EN FS: The river stretches forever.
  hu FS: A folyó a végtelenbe húzódik.
  EN TP: stretching over the mountains
  hu TP: a hegyeken át húzódik
  EN FP: stretching before a run
  hu FP: nyújtás futás előtt
4521 | distance (noun): a far away region | loc: messzeség
  EN TS: Towers fade in the distance.
  hu TS: Tornyok vesznek bele a messzeségbe.
  EN FS: Houses fade in the distance.
  hu FS: Házak vesznek bele a messzeségbe.
  EN TP: towers in the distance
  hu TP: tornyok a messzeségben
  EN FP: a long-distance phone call
  hu FP: távolsági telefonhívás
4522 | tour (noun): a journey all the way around a place | loc: körút
  EN TS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and dumplings!
  hu TS: A körútján van fal, hajó és gombóc!
  EN FS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and pizza!
  hu FS: A körútján van fal, hajó és pizza!
  EN TP: a tour of China
  hu TP: kínai körút
  EN FP: a tour of Italy
  hu FP: olaszországi körút
4524 | fold (verb): to bend so that one part covers the other | loc: összehajtani
  EN TS: Perfectly folded dumplings.
  hu TS: Tökéletesen összehajtott gombócok.
  EN FS: Perfectly folded napkins.
  hu FS: Tökéletesen összehajtott szalvéták.
  EN TP: folding dumpling edges
  hu TP: gombóc széleinek összehajtása
  EN FP: folding clean laundry
  hu FP: tiszta ruhák összehajtása
4525 | help (verb): to give help or assistance to someone | loc: segíteni
  EN TS: She helped him breathe again.
  hu TS: Segített neki újra levegőt venni.
  EN FS: She helped him stand up again.
  hu FS: Segített neki újra felállni.
  EN TP: helping a choking man
  hu TP: segíteni egy fuldokló férfin
  EN FP: helping with the dishes
  hu FP: segíteni a mosogatásban
4526 | election (noun): a vote to choose a winner for a position | loc: választás
  EN TS: She is thinking very hard about this election.
  hu TS: A lány nagyon keményen gondolkodik ezen a választáson.
  EN FS: He is thinking very hard about this election.
  hu FS: A srác nagyon keményen gondolkodik ezen a választáson.
  EN TP: voting in an election
  hu TP: szavazás egy választáson
  EN FP: winning an election
  hu FP: választást nyerni
4527 | vegetable (noun): a plant part you eat, like roots, leaves or stems | loc: zöldség
  EN TS: He is chopping vegetables!
  hu TS: Zöldséget aprít!
  EN FS: He is chopping meat!
  hu FS: Húst aprít!
  EN TP: chopping vegetables
  hu TP: zöldségaprítás
  EN FP: washing vegetables
  hu FP: zöldségmosás
4528 | grave (noun): a place in the ground where a dead body is buried | loc: sír
  EN TS: Old graves surround the church.
  hu TS: Régi sírok veszik körül a templomot.
  EN FS: Old graves surround the castle.
  hu FS: Régi sírok veszik körül a várat.
  EN TP: graves around a church
  hu TP: sírok egy templom körül
  EN FP: graves on a battlefield
  hu FP: sírok egy csatatéren
4529 | color (noun): what things look like from the light they reflect | loc: szín
  EN TS: Floor full of color. Magic!
  hu TS: Színekkel teli padló. Varázslat!
  EN FS: Floor full of water. Magic!
  hu FS: Vízzel teli padló. Varázslat!
  EN TP: colors on a stone floor
  hu TP: színek a kőpadlón
  EN FP: colors on a painted wall
  hu FP: színek egy festett falon
4530 | film (noun): a story told with moving pictures and sound | loc: film
  EN TS: Popcorn is flying at the film!
  hu TS: Repül a popcorn a film alatt!
  EN FS: Drinks are flying at the film!
  hu FS: Repülnek az italok a film alatt!
  EN TP: watching a film
  hu TP: filmet nézni
  EN FP: making a film
  hu FP: filmet forgatni
4531 | popcorn (noun): corn heated until it bursts into white pieces | loc: popcorn
  EN TS: She is ready with her popcorn.
  hu TS: Készen áll a popcornjával.
  EN FS: She is ready with her pizza.
  hu FS: Készen áll a pizzájával.
  EN TP: a big tub of popcorn
  hu TP: nagy vödör popcorn
  EN FP: making popcorn at home
  hu FP: otthoni popcornkészítés
4532 | trash (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: szemét
  EN TS: Park duty: picking up trash.
  hu TS: Parkszolgálat: szemétszedés.
  EN FS: Park duty: picking up flowers.
  hu FS: Parkszolgálat: virágszedés.
  EN TP: picking up park trash
  hu TP: szemétszedés a parkban
  EN FP: a full trash can
  hu FP: teli szemeteskuka
4533 | court (noun): a room in which a law court sits | loc: tárgyalóterem
  EN TS: They are celebrating in court.
  hu TS: A tárgyalóteremben ünnepelnek.
  EN FS: They are crying in court.
  hu FS: A tárgyalóteremben sírnak.
  EN TP: a happy family in court
  hu TP: boldog család a tárgyalóteremben
  EN FP: a tennis court party
  hu FP: buli a teniszpályán
4534 | official (noun): a worker who holds an office | loc: tisztviselő
  EN TS: The official wears a chain.
  hu TS: A tisztviselő láncot visel.
  EN FS: The official wears a crown.
  hu FS: A tisztviselő koronát visel.
  EN TP: an official with a chain
  hu TP: tisztviselő lánccal
  EN FP: an official stamping passports
  hu FP: útlevelet pecsételő tisztviselő
4535 | lesson (noun): a unit of instruction | loc: tanóra
  EN TS: He is throwing paper during the lesson!
  hu TS: Papírt dobál a tanórán!
  EN FS: He is throwing chalk during the lesson!
  hu FS: Krétát dobál a tanórán!
  EN TP: a math lesson
  hu TP: matematika tanóra
  EN FP: a swimming lesson
  hu FP: úszóóra
4536 | craft (noun): the skilled practice of a practical job | loc: mesterség
  EN TS: The craft here is pottery.
  hu TS: Itt a mesterség a fazekasság.
  EN FS: The craft here is painting.
  hu FS: Itt a mesterség a festés.
  EN TP: the craft of pottery
  hu TP: a fazekas mesterség
  EN FP: the craft of glassmaking
  hu FP: az üvegfúvó mesterség
4537 | clear (verb): to rid a place of obstructions | loc: kiüríteni
  EN TS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she collapsed.
  hu TS: Kiürítette az egész lakást. Aztán összeesett.
  EN FS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she danced.
  hu FS: Kiürítette az egész lakást. Aztán táncolt.
  EN TP: clearing the shelves
  hu TP: a polcok kiürítése
  EN FP: clearing her throat
  hu FP: torokköszörülés
4538 | rest (noun): freedom from work or activity | loc: pihenés
  EN TS: Task done. Time for a rest.
  hu TS: Feladat kész. Jöhet a pihenés.
  EN FS: Task done. Time for a run.
  hu FS: Feladat kész. Jöhet a futás.
  EN TP: a rest on the sofa
  hu TP: pihenés a kanapén
  EN FP: a highway rest stop
  hu FP: autópálya-pihenő
4539 | cartoon (noun): a humorous drawing in a newspaper | loc: humoros rajz
  EN TS: The cartoon man is mopping.
  hu TS: A humoros rajzon a férfi felmos.
  EN FS: The cartoon man is cooking.
  hu FS: A humoros rajzon a férfi főz.
  EN TP: a cartoon of a cleaner
  hu TP: humoros rajz egy takarítóról
  EN FP: a cartoon of a cook
  hu FP: humoros rajz egy szakácsról
4540 | equipment (noun): the things needed to do a job or service | loc: felszerelés
  EN TS: Proper safety equipment.
  hu TS: Megfelelő biztonsági felszerelés.
  EN FS: Proper diving equipment.
  hu FS: Megfelelő búvárfelszerelés.
  EN TP: window-cleaning equipment
  hu TP: ablaktisztító felszerelés
  EN FP: gym equipment in a hall
  hu FP: edzőtermi felszerelés
4541 | filthy (adjective): disgustingly dirty | loc: mocskos
  EN TS: The sink was filthy with hair!
  hu TS: A mosdó mocskos volt a hajtól!
  EN FS: The sink was filthy with mud!
  hu FS: A mosdó mocskos volt a sártól!
  EN TP: a filthy hairy basin
  hu TP: mocskos, hajas mosdó
  EN FP: filthy boots by the door
  hu FP: mocskos bakancs az ajtónál
4542 | agreement (noun): a statement of promises exchanged | loc: megállapodás
  EN TS: They reached an agreement.
  hu TS: Megállapodásra jutottak.
  EN FS: They reached the airport.
  hu FS: Megérkeztek a reptérre.
  EN TP: shaking hands on an agreement
  hu TP: kézfogás a megállapodásra
  EN FP: a rental agreement
  hu FP: bérleti megállapodás
4543 | risk (noun): a source of danger, a chance of loss | loc: kockázat
  EN TS: That thin rope is a tiny risk.
  hu TS: Az a vékony kötél aprócska kockázat.
  EN FS: That ladder is a tiny risk.
  hu FS: Az a létra aprócska kockázat.
  EN TP: risk on a sea cliff
  hu TP: kockázat egy tengeri sziklán
  EN FP: risk in a casino
  hu FP: kockázat egy kaszinóban
4544 | contrast (noun): the difference between things that are compared | loc: kontraszt
  EN TS: Sand and ice. Small contrast.
  hu TS: Homok és jég. Kis kontraszt.
  EN FS: Sea and ice. Small contrast.
  hu FS: Tenger és jég. Kis kontraszt.
  EN TP: sand and ice in contrast
  hu TP: homok és jég kontrasztja
  EN FP: day and night in contrast
  hu FP: nappal és éjszaka kontrasztja
4545 | strength (noun): being physically or mentally strong | loc: erő | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She has huge finger strength.
  hu TS: A lánynak óriási ujjereje van.
  EN FS: He has huge finger strength.
  hu FS: A srácnak óriási ujjereje van.
  EN TP: strength in her fingers
  hu TP: erő az ujjaiban
  EN FP: strength in her legs
  hu FP: erő a lábaiban
4546 | surgery (noun): a room where you see a doctor or dentist | loc: rendelő
  EN TS: The surgery has a green couch.
  hu TS: A rendelőben zöld kanapé van.
  EN FS: The surgery has a red couch.
  hu FS: A rendelőben piros kanapé van.
  EN TP: a boy in the surgery
  hu TP: egy fiú a rendelőben
  EN FP: a boy having surgery
  hu FP: egy fiút műtenek
4547 | waiting room (noun): a room with seats where people wait | loc: váróterem
  EN TS: They are in the waiting room.
  hu TS: A váróteremben vannak.
  EN FS: They are in the dining room.
  hu FS: Az ebédlőben vannak.
  EN TP: sitting in a waiting room
  hu TP: ülés a váróteremben
  EN FP: sitting in a living room
  hu FP: ülés a nappaliban
4548 | late (adverb): later than usual or expected | loc: későn
  EN TS: Oh no, he woke up late!
  hu TS: Jaj ne, későn ébredt!
  EN FS: Oh no, he woke up early!
  hu FS: Jaj ne, korán ébredt!
  EN TP: waking up late
  hu TP: későn ébredni
  EN FP: working late
  hu FP: későig dolgozni
4549 | fuel (noun): a substance burned to produce energy | loc: tüzelőanyag
  EN TS: He is shovelling fuel.
  hu TS: Tüzelőanyagot lapátol.
  EN FS: He is shovelling snow.
  hu FS: Havat lapátol.
  EN TP: shovelling black fuel
  hu TP: fekete tüzelőanyag lapátolása
  EN FP: fuel for a rocket
  hu FP: rakéta-üzemanyag
4550 | finally (adverb): after a long delay, at last | loc: végre
  EN TS: Finally, coffee. She is alive.
  hu TS: Végre kávé. Újra él.
  EN FS: Finally, tea. She is alive.
  hu FS: Végre tea. Újra él.
  EN TP: finally drinking coffee
  hu TP: végre kávét iszik
  EN FP: finally going to bed
  hu FP: végre ágyba bújik
4551 | camp (verb): to live in a tent | loc: sátorozik
  EN TS: Cheap tent. Great camping!
  hu TS: Olcsó sátor. Szuper sátorozás!
  EN FS: Cheap car. Great camping!
  hu FS: Olcsó autó. Szuper sátorozás!
  EN TP: camping by a lake
  hu TP: sátorozás a tónál
  EN FP: camping in the snow
  hu FP: sátorozás a hóban
4553 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: haj
  EN TS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the dog.
  hu TS: Egy kefe a hajához, aztán ugyanaz a kutyának.
  EN FS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the cat.
  hu FS: Egy kefe a hajához, aztán ugyanaz a macskának.
  EN TP: brushing long dark hair
  hu TP: hosszú sötét haj fésülése
  EN FP: dog hair on a sofa
  hu FP: kutyaszőr a kanapén
4554 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: láng
  EN TS: A wall of flame, and he keeps cooking.
  hu TS: Egy lángfal, és ő csak főz tovább.
  EN FS: A wall of water, and he keeps cooking.
  hu FS: Egy vízfal, és ő csak főz tovább.
  EN TP: a wall of orange flame
  hu TP: narancssárga lángfal
  EN FP: a candle flame at dinner
  hu FP: gyertyaláng vacsoránál
4555 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: fenyő
  EN TS: Pines below, peaks ahead.
  hu TS: Lent fenyők, előttünk csúcsok.
  EN FS: Palms below, peaks ahead.
  hu FS: Lent pálmák, előttünk csúcsok.
  EN TP: rows of snowy pines
  hu TP: havas fenyők sorai
  EN FP: a pine kitchen table
  hu FP: fenyőfa konyhaasztal
4556 | praise (verb): to express approval of someone | loc: dicsérni
  EN TS: The whole team is praising him.
  hu TS: Az egész csapat dicséri.
  EN FS: The whole team is ignoring him.
  hu FS: Az egész csapat levegőnek nézi.
  EN TP: praising a colleague
  hu TP: kolléga dicsérése
  EN FP: praising a dog
  hu FP: kutya dicsérése
4557 | lap (noun): the top of your thighs when you sit | loc: öl
  EN TS: The dog stole his lap!
  hu TS: A kutya elfoglalta az ölét!
  EN FS: The cat stole his lap!
  hu FS: A macska elfoglalta az ölét!
  EN TP: a dog on his lap
  hu TP: kutya az ölében
  EN FP: a lap around the track
  hu FP: egy kör a pályán
4558 | support (noun): help given to a person or cause | loc: támogatás
  EN TS: His friends are his support.
  hu TS: A barátaitól kap támogatást.
  EN FS: His parents are his support.
  hu FS: A szüleitől kap támogatást.
  EN TP: support from friends
  hu TP: támogatás a barátoktól
  EN FP: support from his parents
  hu FP: támogatás a szülőktől
4559 | console (verb): to give emotional strength to someone sad | loc: vigasztalni
  EN TS: Friends are consoling him.
  hu TS: A barátai vigasztalják.
  EN FS: Friends are teasing him.
  hu FS: A barátai ugratják.
  EN TP: consoling a crying friend
  hu TP: síró barát vigasztalása
  EN FP: playing on a console
  hu FP: játék a konzolon
4560 | crew (noun): the men and women who run a ship or aircraft | loc: legénység
  EN TS: The crew is rowing in time.
  hu TS: A legénység ütemre evez.
  EN FS: The crew is singing in time.
  hu FS: A legénység ütemre énekel.
  EN TP: a rowing crew
  hu TP: evezős legénység
  EN FP: a film crew
  hu FP: forgatócsoport
4561 | command (noun): an instruction with authority to do something | loc: parancs
  EN TS: She is shouting commands.
  hu TS: Parancsokat kiabál.
  EN FS: She is whispering commands.
  hu FS: Parancsokat suttog.
  EN TP: shouting commands
  hu TP: parancsok kiabálása
  EN FP: typing commands
  hu FP: parancsok begépelése
4562 | direction (noun): the line leading to a place | loc: irány
  EN TS: She is checking the direction. Serious face.
  hu TS: Ellenőrzi az irányt. Komoly arc.
  EN FS: She is checking the time. Serious face.
  hu FS: Ellenőrzi az időt. Komoly arc.
  EN TP: finding the right direction
  hu TP: a jó irány megtalálása
  EN FP: asking for directions
  hu FP: útbaigazítást kérni
4563 | law (noun): a legal document of rules for an activity | loc: törvény
  EN TS: The law book has gold corners.
  hu TS: A törvénykönyv sarkai aranyból vannak.
  EN FS: The law book has iron corners.
  hu FS: A törvénykönyv sarkai vasból vannak.
  EN TP: a huge book of law
  hu TP: vaskos törvénykönyv
  EN FP: breaking the law
  hu FP: megszegni a törvényt
4564 | cooperation (noun): working together, joint action | loc: együttműködés
  EN TS: The barn needs cooperation.
  hu TS: A csűrépítéshez együttműködés kell.
  EN FS: The boat needs cooperation.
  hu FS: A hajóépítéshez együttműködés kell.
  EN TP: cooperation at a barn raising
  hu TP: együttműködés csűrépítésnél
  EN FP: cooperation between countries
  hu FP: együttműködés országok között
4565 | globe (noun): an object shaped like a ball | loc: gömb
  EN TS: The Earth looks like a globe.
  hu TS: A Föld olyan, mint egy gömb.
  EN FS: The Moon looks like a globe.
  hu FS: A Hold olyan, mint egy gömb.
  EN TP: a blue and green globe
  hu TP: kék-zöld gömb
  EN FP: a globe on a desk
  hu FP: gömb egy íróasztalon
4566 | summit (noun): the top point of a mountain or hill | loc: csúcs
  EN TS: She is reaching the summit!
  hu TS: Eléri a csúcsot!
  EN FS: She is reaching the river!
  hu FS: Eléri a folyót!
  EN TP: reaching the summit
  hu TP: a csúcs elérése
  EN FP: a summit of world leaders
  hu FP: világvezetők csúcstalálkozója
4567 | ill (adjective): affected by a physical or mental problem | loc: beteg
  EN TS: She looks a bit ill.
  hu TS: Kicsit betegnek tűnik.
  EN FS: She looks very happy.
  hu FS: Nagyon boldognak tűnik.
  EN TP: ill and coughing
  hu TP: beteg és köhög
  EN FP: ill in bed
  hu FP: betegen az ágyban
4568 | continent (noun): one of the large landmasses of the earth | loc: kontinens
  EN TS: She is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  hu TS: A csaj minden kontinensen ugrál. Olcsó utazás!
  EN FS: He is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  hu FS: A srác minden kontinensen ugrál. Olcsó utazás!
  EN TP: jumping on a continent
  hu TP: ugrálás egy kontinensen
  EN FP: drawing a continent
  hu FP: kontinens rajzolása
4569 | to fry (verb): to cook food in hot oil in a pan | loc: kisütni
  EN TS: He is frying fish. Van life!
  hu TS: Kisüti a halat. Vanlife!
  EN FS: He is frying eggs. Van life!
  hu FS: Kisüti a tojást. Vanlife!
  EN TP: frying fish in a van
  hu TP: hal kisütése egy furgonban
  EN FP: frying fish on a boat
  hu FP: hal kisütése egy hajón
4570 | chef (noun): a professional cook | loc: séf
  EN TS: The chef is plating pork.
  hu TS: A séf sertéshúst tálal.
  EN FS: The chef is plating fish.
  hu FS: A séf halat tálal.
  EN TP: a chef plating a dish
  hu TP: egy fogást tálaló séf
  EN FP: a chef eating a dish
  hu FP: egy fogást evő séf
4571 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: tolni
  EN TS: Everyone is pushing the boat.
  hu TS: Mindenki tolja a hajót.
  EN FS: Everyone is pushing the car.
  hu FS: Mindenki tolja az autót.
  EN TP: pushing a boat to sea
  hu TP: hajó tolása a tengerbe
  EN FP: pushing a car uphill
  hu FP: autó tolása felfelé
4572 | correct (verb): to make something right | loc: kijavítani | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She will correct them forever.
  hu TS: Ez a nő örökké ki fogja javítani őket.
  EN FS: He will correct them forever.
  hu FS: Ez a férfi örökké ki fogja javítani őket.
  EN TP: correcting exam papers
  hu TP: dolgozatok kijavítása
  EN FP: correcting her posture
  hu FP: a testtartása kijavítása
4573 | secret (adjective): kept private, not open or public | loc: titkos
  EN TS: A secret deal over cash.
  hu TS: Titkos üzlet, készpénzzel.
  EN FS: A secret deal over coffee.
  hu FS: Titkos üzlet, kávé mellett.
  EN TP: a secret cash deal
  hu TP: titkos készpénzes üzlet
  EN FP: a secret love letter
  hu FP: titkos szerelmes levél
4575 | cold (noun): a mild viral infection of the nose and throat | loc: nátha
  EN TS: Her cold came to the library.
  hu TS: A náthája elkísérte a könyvtárba.
  EN FS: Her cold came to the cinema.
  hu FS: A náthája elkísérte a moziba.
  EN TP: a cold in the library
  hu TP: nátha a könyvtárban
  EN FP: a cold in the snow
  hu FP: nátha a hóban
4576 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: számolni
  EN TS: She is counting a mountain of paper.
  hu TS: Egy hegynyi papírt számol.
  EN FS: She is counting a mountain of coins.
  hu FS: Egy hegynyi érmét számol.
  EN TP: counting sheets of paper
  hu TP: papírlapok számolása
  EN FP: counting coins on a table
  hu FP: érmék számolása az asztalon
4577 | country (noun): the territory of a nation | loc: ország
  EN TS: She is showing us her country.
  hu TS: Megmutatja nekünk az országát.
  EN FS: She is showing us her ship.
  hu FS: Megmutatja nekünk a hajóját.
  EN TP: a country of fields
  hu TP: mezők országa
  EN FP: a country house
  hu FP: vidéki ház
4578 | crop (noun): what plants yield in one growing season | loc: termés
  EN TS: Crop fields form a patchwork.
  hu TS: A terméssel teli mezők mozaikot alkotnak.
  EN FS: Car parks form a patchwork.
  hu FS: A parkolók mozaikot alkotnak.
  EN TP: fields of green crops
  hu TP: zöld terméssel teli mezők
  EN FP: a crop of apples
  hu FP: almatermés
4579 | abroad (adverb): to or in a foreign country | loc: külföldön
  EN TS: She travels abroad a lot!
  hu TS: Rengeteget utazik külföldre!
  EN FS: She stays at home a lot!
  hu FS: Rengeteget van otthon!
  EN TP: travelling abroad
  hu TP: külföldön utazgatni
  EN FP: studying abroad
  hu FP: külföldön tanulni
4580 | date (noun): a meeting arranged in advance | loc: randi
  EN TS: Their date has one milkshake.
  hu TS: A randijukon egyetlen turmix van.
  EN FS: Their date has one pizza.
  hu FS: A randijukon egyetlen pizza van.
  EN TP: a milkshake date
  hu TP: turmixos randi
  EN FP: the date on a calendar
  hu FP: dátum a naptárban
4581 | candy (noun): a sweet made of flavored sugar | loc: cukorka
  EN TS: A blanket den full of candy.
  hu TS: Takaróvár tele cukorkával.
  EN FS: A blanket den full of books.
  hu FS: Takaróvár tele könyvekkel.
  EN TP: a bowl of candy
  hu TP: egy tál cukorka
  EN FP: a candy shop window
  hu FP: cukorkabolt kirakata
4582 | measure (verb): to find the size or measurements of something | loc: mérni
  EN TS: An adult is measuring them.
  hu TS: Egy felnőtt méri őket.
  EN FS: An adult is feeding them.
  hu FS: Egy felnőtt eteti őket.
  EN TP: to measure who is taller
  hu TP: megmérni, ki a magasabb
  EN FP: to measure a room
  hu FP: szobát lemérni
4583 | calf (noun): the thick muscle at the back of your lower leg | loc: vádli
  EN TS: Ouch! He is holding his calf.
  hu TS: Jaj! A vádliját fogja.
  EN FS: Ouch! He is holding his head.
  hu FS: Jaj! A fejét fogja.
  EN TP: a cramp in his calf
  hu TP: görcs a vádlijában
  EN FP: a calf in a field
  hu FP: borjú a mezőn
4584 | trail (noun): a track or mark left by something passing | loc: nyom
  EN TS: The turtle left a trail.
  hu TS: A teknős nyomot hagyott.
  EN FS: The crab left a trail.
  hu FS: A rák nyomot hagyott.
  EN TP: a trail of flipper prints
  hu TP: uszonynyomok sora
  EN FP: a hiking trail
  hu FP: túraösvény
4585 | crossing (noun): traveling across something | loc: átkelés
  EN TS: Beret, baguette, stylish crossing.
  hu TS: Svájcisapka, bagett, stílusos átkelés.
  EN FS: Beret, guitar, stylish crossing.
  hu FS: Svájcisapka, gitár, stílusos átkelés.
  EN TP: a crossing with a baguette
  hu TP: átkelés bagettel
  EN FP: a border crossing by car
  hu FP: autós határátkelés
4586 | crosswalk (noun): the striped part of a road for crossing | loc: gyalogátkelő
  EN TS: She is on the crosswalk.
  hu TS: A gyalogátkelőn van.
  EN FS: She is on the bridge.
  hu FS: A hídon van.
  EN TP: a busy Paris crosswalk
  hu TP: forgalmas párizsi gyalogátkelő
  EN FP: a crosswalk in the snow
  hu FP: gyalogátkelő a hóban
4587 | cyclist (noun): a person who rides a bicycle | loc: kerékpáros
  EN TS: No way! The cyclist is surprised.
  hu TS: Nem hiszem el! A kerékpáros meglepődött.
  EN FS: No way! The cyclist is sleeping.
  hu FS: Nem hiszem el! A kerékpáros alszik.
  EN TP: a cyclist at a junction
  hu TP: kerékpáros egy kereszteződésben
  EN FP: a cyclist at a race
  hu FP: kerékpáros egy versenyen
4588 | traffic (noun): the vehicles and people moving along a place | loc: forgalom
  EN TS: The traffic is stopped.
  hu TS: Áll a forgalom.
  EN FS: The traffic is moving.
  hu FS: Halad a forgalom.
  EN TP: stopped traffic at night
  hu TP: álló forgalom éjjel
  EN FP: heavy traffic in the day
  hu FP: nagy forgalom nappal
4589 | pedestrian (noun): a person walking in the street, not driving | loc: gyalogos
  EN TS: So many pedestrians!
  hu TS: Mennyi gyalogos!
  EN FS: So many cyclists!
  hu FS: Mennyi kerékpáros!
  EN TP: pedestrians on a junction
  hu TP: gyalogosok egy kereszteződésben
  EN FP: a pedestrian zone with shops
  hu FP: gyalogos övezet boltokkal
4590 | vacation (noun): leisure time away from work for rest or fun | loc: szabadság
  EN TS: Vacation mode: big splash!
  hu TS: Szabadság üzemmód: nagy csobbanás!
  EN FS: Vacation mode: long nap!
  hu FS: Szabadság üzemmód: hosszú szunya!
  EN TP: a vacation on a ship
  hu TP: szabadság egy hajón
  EN FP: a vacation on a train
  hu FP: szabadság egy vonaton
4591 | ship (noun): a large vessel that carries passengers or goods | loc: hajó
  EN TS: The ship offers a pool on the top deck.
  hu TS: A hajó felső fedélzetén medence van.
  EN FS: The ship offers a cinema on the top deck.
  hu FS: A hajó felső fedélzetén mozi van.
  EN TP: a big passenger ship
  hu TP: nagy utasszállító hajó
  EN FP: a big cargo ship
  hu FP: nagy teherhajó
4592 | foot (noun): the part of the leg below the ankle | loc: láb
  EN TS: Wine made with feet. Tasty?
  hu TS: Lábbal készült bor. Finom?
  EN FS: Beer made with feet. Tasty?
  hu FS: Lábbal készült sör. Finom?
  EN TP: bare feet in grapes
  hu TP: mezítelen lábak a szőlőben
  EN FP: bare feet in the sand
  hu FP: mezítelen lábak a homokban
4593 | hospital (noun): a health facility where patients get treatment | loc: kórház
  EN TS: He is walking in the hospital.
  hu TS: Sétál a kórházban.
  EN FS: He is running in the hospital.
  hu FS: Fut a kórházban.
  EN TP: a long hospital corridor
  hu TP: hosszú kórházi folyosó
  EN FP: a hospital car park
  hu FP: kórházi parkoló
